H. FIGHT AGAINST TERRORISM  

1. Please provide information on legislation or other rules governing this area, and their adhesion to relevant international conventions. 
The Laws containing provisions relevant for the fight against terrorism are the following:   The Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 37/96, 80/99, 4/02 and 43/03 and 19/04);   The Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 15/97, 44/02 and 74/04);   The Law on Prevention of Laundering of Money and Other Proceeds from Crime (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No.46/04),    The Law on Asylum and Temporary Protection (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” No. 49/04);   The Law on Internal Affairs (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” Nos. 19/95, 55/97, 33/02 and19/04) ;   The Law on the Intelligence Agency (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 19/95). The provisions from the Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 37/96, 80/99, 4/02 and 43/04) express the intentions of the legislator to align with and implement the international criminal law standards in the fight against terrorism. Namely, the domestic legislation incriminates all the acts, which, under the generally accepted standards and criteria, are considered as terrorist acts. The Article 313 of the Criminal Code incriminates Terrorism as a crime, Article 419 incriminates the actions of the perpetrators of International terrorism, and Article 394a of the Law Amending of the Criminal Code also incriminates Creation of terrorist organisation, and the financing, public incitement, instigating or supporting the creation of such organisation. Furthermore, more sever sanctions for crimes connected to terrorism have been introduced.    The Law on Prevention of Money Laundering and Other Proceeds from Crime regulates the area of terrorism as well (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 46/04).     The Law on Prevention of Money Laundering and Other Proceeds from Crime stipulates the measures and activities for detection and prevention of laundering money and other proceeds from crime, as well as the organisation and control over their enforcement.   The provisions of the Law on Asylum and Temporary Protection, prescribe that acting against the constitutional system of the Republic of Macedonia, committing a crime against humanity or international law, purposes and principles of the United Nations, represent a ground for cessation of the right to asylum, i.e. the refugee status (Article 6).    The provisions of the Law on Internal Affairs (Article 13) define the competence of the Ministry of the Interior (The Directorate for State Security and Counterintelligence) to perform activities related to suppression of terrorism.    The provisions of the Law on Intelligence Agency (Article 2), prescribe the responsibility of the Intelligence Agency in gathering data and information of significance for the security of the Republic of Macedonia.  The Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia has adopted the National Strategy on Security and Defence (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No.40/03), which identifies terrorism as one of the risks and threats to the security.  The legislative setting in the Republic of Macedonia clearly indicates the intention to ensure participation of the Republic of Macedonia in the international cooperation in the fight against terrorism.       In terms of the instruments of the United Nations on fight against terrorism, the Republic of Macedonia has signed, ratified and implemented the following Documents: 1. Convention on Prevention and Punishment of Crimes against Internationally Protected Persons, including Diplomatic Agents:   The Republic of Macedonia is a Party since 12.03.1998 following the notification on succession.    The provisions of the Convention are implemented in the Articles 141, 181, 182, 183, 309, 310, 311, 419 and 420 of the Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 37/96, 80/99, 4/02 and 43/04). 2. International Convention against Taking of Hostages:   The Republic of Macedonia is a Party since 29.01.1998 following the notification on succession;    The provisions of the Convention are implemented in the Article 421 of the Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 37/96, 80/99, 4/02 and 43/04). 3. Convention for Suppression of Unlawful Seizure of Aircraft:    The Republic of Macedonia is a Party since 07.01.1998 following the notification on succession.     The provisions of the Convention are implemented in Articles 302 and 303 of the Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 37/96, 37/96, 80/99, 4/02 and 43/04). 4. Convention on Offences and Certain Other Acts Committed on Board Aircraft:    The Republic of Macedonia is a Party since 30.08.1996 following the notification on succession;      The provisions of the Convention are implemented in the Articles 302 and 303 of the Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 37/96, 80/99, 4/02 and 43/04).  5. Convention on Physical Protection of Nuclear Material:    The Republic of Macedonia is a Party since 20.09.1996 following the notification on succession;   The provisions of the Conventions are implemented within the Articles 231, 288 and 407-b of the Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos.37/96, 80/99, 4/02 and 43/04). 6. Convention for Suppression of Unlawful Acts against the Safety of Civil Aviation,    The Republic of Macedonia is a Party since 04.011995 following the notification on succession;   The provisions of the Conventions are implemented within the Articles 300 and 303 of the Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” Nos.37/96, 80/99, 4/02 and 43/04). 7. Protocol on Suppression of Unlawful Acts of Violence at Airports Serving International Civil Aviation, supplementary to Convention for Suppression of Unlawful Acts against Safety of Civil Aviation,    The Republic of Macedonia is a Party since 04.01.1995 following the notification on succession;    The provisions of the Conventions are implemented within the Articles 304, 403-a and 404 of the Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos.37/96, 80/99, 4/02 and 43/04). 8. International Convention for Suppression of Terrorist Bombings   The Republic of Macedonia has signed this Convention on 16.12.1998, ratified on 06.04.2004.     The provisions of the Conventions are implemented in the Articles 288 of the Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” Nos.37/96, 80/99, 4/02 and 43/04). 9. International Convention for Suppression of Financing of Terrorism   The Republic of Macedonia has signed this Convention on 31.01.2000, ratified on 06.05. 2004;    The provisions of the Conventions are implemented within the Article 273 of the Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” Nos.37/96, 80/99, 4/02 and 43/04). In terms of instruments of the Council of Europe on fight against terrorism, Republic of Macedonia has signed, ratified and implemented the following Documents:   European Convention on Suppression of Terrorism; signed on 08.11.2001, ratified on 29.11.2004. The provisions of the Conventions are implemented within the Articles 313, 419 and 394-a of the Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” Nos. 37/96 80/99, 4/02 and 43/04).   European Convention on Extradition and the Additional Protocols; signed on 28.07.1999, ratified on 28.07.1999 and entered into force on 26.10.1999. The provisions of the Convention are implemented within the Articles 509 to 525 of the Law on Criminal Procedure, and Articles 181 up to 186 of the Law Amendmending the Law on Criminal Procedure (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” Nos. 15/9, 44/02 and 74/04).    European Convention on Mutual Assistance in Criminal Matters; signed on 28.07.1999, ratified on 28.07.1999 and entered into force 26.10.1999. The provisions of the Conventions are implemented within the Articles 502 up to 509 of the Law on Criminal Procedure of the Republic of Macedonia (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos.15/97, 44/02 and 74/04).   Additional Protocol to European Convention on Mutual Assistance in Criminal Matters; signed on 28.07.1999, ratified on 28.07.1999 and entered into force 26.10.1999.. The provisions of the Conventions are implemented within the Articles 502 up to 509 of the Law on Criminal Procedure of the Republic of Macedonia (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” Nos.15/97, 44/02 and 74/04).   Convention on Laundering, Search, Seizure and Confiscation of the Proceeds from Crime; signed on 14.12.1999, ratified on 19.05.2000 and entered into force 01.09.2000. The provisions of the Conventions are implemented within the Articles 273 of the Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” Nos .3 7/96, 80/99, 4/02 and 43/04), and within the provisions of the Law on Prevention of Money Laundering and other Proceeds of Crime (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” No. 46/04). Pursuant to Article 118 of the Constitution of Republic of Macedonia (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” No. 52/91), the international agreements ratified in accordance with the Constitution are a part of the internal legal order and cannot be changed by law.  2. Is your country faced with any specific form of terrorism? If so, is it of internal or external origin? 
Following the terrorist attacks on the USA of 11.09.2001 and the changes of the geo-political factors resulting from the global threat, Republic of Macedonia joined the international anti-terrorist coalition. The Republic of Macedonia directly participates with units of the Army of the Republic of Macedonia in the international missions in Afghanistan – ISAF, as of 2002, and in Iraq, IRAQ FREEDOM as of 2003.  Such involvement of the Republic of Macedonia in the international anti-terrorist coalition includes the risk of exposure to acts of terror, specifically those undertaken by Islamic radical groups and organisations against institutions, nationals or interests of the Republic of Macedonia, within the country or abroad. Such an attack was the one against the Office of the Honorary Consul of the Republic of Macedonia in Karachi, Pakistan, on 06.12.2002, when three persons were killed, as well as the murder of the three Macedonian citizens – civilians, who were working in Iraq, in October 2004. Internally, since its independence, the Republic of Macedonia has been exposed to certain threats from terrorist activities against its national interests. Specific terrorist actions in the Republic of Macedonia were performed in 1995 (the assassination attempt against the President of the Republic of Macedonia); in 1997 the court in Gostivar was a target of a bomb attack, while in 1998 the targets of bomb attacks were the police stations in Prilep, Kumanovo, Tetovo, the Court in Kievo, as well as the Skopje – Belgrade railroad.  The 2001 armed conflict disrupted the security situation in the Republic of Macedonia to a greater extent. After the Ohrid Framework Agreement was signed, and after its implementation commenced, the Republic of Macedonia still faced threats of individual acts of terrorism, particularly by persons and criminal groups that were active in the former crisis regions. Such threats are used by the “Front for National Unification of Albanians” and the “Albanian National Army” (the platform of which is to create the “United Albanian State” in the Balkans, using violent methods and means, due to which they are declared by the European Union and the USA as terrorist organisations) in preparation and committing individual terrorist acts or actrs of violence, for shich they claim responsibility.  In 2002 and 2003 acts with features of terrorism were perpetrated and criminal charges were instituted for the crime of Terrorism and perpetrators were sentenced to appropriate prison sentences. In 2004, along with the stabilisation of the security situation, no terrorist acts were registered, although possibility for individual acts of terror and violence by individual criminal groups related to “FNOA” (Front for National Unification of the Albanians”) and “ANA” (Albanian National Army”), as well as by other extremist individuals and groups who oppose the implementation of the Framework Agreement, founding their activities on the ideas for "a greater state”, can not be excluded. 3. What is the national legal framework and legal basis for anti-terrorist action? 
The national legal framework is laid down in the laws elaborated in 24_H_1.  The Criminal Code of Republic of Macedonia (Article 313), in defining the act of terrorism, prescribes that a person who, with the intention of endangering the constitutional system or the security of the Republic of Macedonia, causes or seriously threatens to cause an explosion, fire, flood, or some other generally dangerous act or act of violence, creating a sense of insecurity or fear among the citizens, shall be punished with imprisonment of at least four years. A punishment (an imprisonment of at least four years) is also prescribed for any person who creates a conspiracy, gang, group or other association of persons or organisation (Article 324) for the purpose of committing terrorism. The Law prescribes a punishment of one to five years for a person who becomes a member of the conspiracy, gang, group or other association. Acquittal from punishment is foreressen for a member of an association, who discloses the association, before he commits a terrorist act as a member of that association or on behalf of it. Sheltering and assisting the perpetrator (Article 325) of a crime of terrorism (giving shelter, food, money or other means, maintaining contact, performing activities in order to prevent discovery or capture of a perpetrator, or providing assistance in some other way), is also prescribed as a criminal offence. Imprisonment of one to ten years is stipulated. Also, the preparation to commit this crime is incriminated (Article 326), with a prescribed punishment of three to ten years of imprisonment.  The Criminal Code prescribes a more severe sanction (imprisonment of at least ten years) if during the perpetration of the terrorist act, death of one or more persons was caused, or if a property damage of large extent was caused. The intentional killing of one or more persons during the perpetration of the terrorist act, as well as committing such acts during a war or under direct military danger, is sanctioned with imprisonment of at least ten years, or with life imprisonment.  The creation of a terrorist organisation (a gang, group or other criminal organisation) for committing criminal acts is also incriminated in the Criminal Code (imprisonment of at least eight years). The prescribed criminal acts are as follows: murder; bodily injury; kidnapping persons; destruction of public facilities, of transport systems, of infrastructure facilities, of information systems and of other facilities in public use; hijacking aircrafts and other means of public transport; production, possession or trade with nuclear, biological, chemical or other weapons and dangerous substances; release of dangerous radioactive, toxic and other dangerous substances; or causing a fire or explosion, destruction of  utilities for water supply, energy or other basic natural resources, in order to create a sense of insecurity or fear among the citizens or to endanger the constitutional order or the security of the Republic of Macedonia or the interests of an international organisation or foreign state. The Code prescribes more lenient punishment (imprisonment of three months to three years) for the perpetrator who by disclosing the organisation or in some other way prevents the perpetration of the planned crimes.  A punishment (imprisonment of four to ten years) is also prescribed for a member of the group, gang or other criminal organisation, as well as for person who provides financial resources, or provides assistance in some other way. The legislator permits acquittal from punishment for the member of the group, gang or other criminal organisation who discloses the organisation before committing some of the aforementioned crimes, as a member of that organisation, or on behalf of it. The public instigation, call and providing support for creation of a terrorist organisation is incriminated, as well. Article 419 prescribes imprisonment of at least three years for anyone who with the intention of harming a foreign state or some international organisation, commits a kidnapping of another or some other act of violence, causes explosion or fire, or with some other generally dangerous act or by generally dangerous means causes a danger to the life of people and to property of a significant value.  If, because of the above mentioned activities, one or more persons died, or damage was caused of larger extent, i.e. another person was intentionally killed; the perpetrator will be punished with imprisonment of at least five years, i.e. with imprisonment of at least ten years, or with life imprisonment The criminal law of the Republic of Macedonia (Article 116) is applicable when the terrorist act is committed on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia, on a domestic ship or aircraft, regardless where the ship or aircraft were at the time when the crime was committed.  The criminal law of the Republic of Macedonia is applicable to everyone who commits a terrorist act abroad (117), as well as to foreigner who commits a terrorist act abroad against a foreign country or a foreigner (when according to that legislation he/she may be sentenced to five years of imprisonment or to a more severe punishment), and when he/she is not extradited to the foreign country.  The Macedonian law does not permit an extradition of a Macedonian citizen for any criminal offence, inclusive of the criminal offence of terrorism (Article 4 from the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia and Article 510 from the Law on Criminal Procedure). However, under certain pre-conditions, a foreigner-perpetrator of terrorist act can be extradited (Article 29 from the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia and Article 510 from the Law on Criminal Procedure). Namely, in accordance with Article 29 of Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia, a foreigner may be extradited only on the basis of a ratified international agreement and on the principle of reciprocity. A foreigner can not be extradited for a political criminal offence. Pursuant to the explicit provision of the Constitution, the acts of terrorism are not considered as political criminal offences. Article 510 of the Law on Criminal Procedure prescribes the prerequisites for extradition. Namely, the person whose extradition is requested, must not be a citizen of the Republic of Macedonia; the crime for which the extradition is requested must not be committed on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia, against it or against its citizens; the crime for which the extradition is requested must be punishable, according to both domestic and the law of the country in which it has been committed. Additionally,  the criminal prosecution and the execution of the punishment should not have expired the statute of limitations before the foreigner is detained or interrogated as an accused; the foreigner must not have a previous conviction by a domestic court for the same crime; or they must not have a previous acquittal by a final court judgement, regarding the same crime, by the domestic court; or the criminal procedure against them must not be interrupted or the prosecution act must not be irrevocably rejected, unless a guarantee is issued for realisation of the lawful property request of the injured party. Furhtermore, the provisions of the Law on Criminal Procedure require that the identity of the person whose extradition is requested must be determined and that there must be sufficient evidence for a founded suspicion that the foreigner whose extradition is requested has committed a criminal offence or the sentence is final. The Law on Criminal Procedure (Article 142), prescribes an obligation for the Ministry of the Interior to undertake necessary measures, when there is a ground for suspicion that terrorist activities are committed. Actually, the Ministry of the Interior has the duty to undertake the necessary measures to find the perpetrator and the accomplice of the terrorist activity, to find out and secure the traces and objects of the criminal offence, to collate information which may be useful for an efficient conduct of the criminal procedure.  The 2004 Amendments to the Law on Criminal Procedure regulated special investigative measures (communications interception; inspection and search of computer systems or their confiscation, completely or partially; secret observation, surveillance and audio-visual recording of persons and objects with technical devices; simulated purchase of objects, simulated receiving and giving a bribe; controlled delivery and transport of persons and objects; use of undercover agents for monitoring and collection of information; opening simulated bank account; registration of virtual legal entities or use of existent ones for data collecting), which, applied under conditions and in a manner established by law, can be used as an evidence in the criminal procedure.  The Law on Asylum and Temporary Protection prescribes that performing activities against the constitutional system of the Republic of Macedonia, committing criminal offence against humanity and international law, goals and principles of the United Nations is a ground for withdrawal of the right to asylum, or the refugee status (Article 6).  4. Which national departments and agencies are involved in the fight against terrorism? 
Pursuant to the current laws, the following bodies have competencies in the fight against terrorism:    Public Prosecutor’s Office of the Republic of Macedonia, established as a state body that prosecutes perpetrators of crimes, inclusive of the crime of Terrorism and the crimes related to terrorism (Law on Public Prosecutor’s Office, ”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 38/04);    Intelligence Agency (Law on Intelligence Agency, ”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 19/95);   Ministry of the Interior (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos.19/95, 55/97, 38/02, 33/03 and 19/04) through:    The Directorate for Security and Counterintelligence (Article 13 of the Law on Internal Affairs and the Rulebook on Operation of the Directorate, ”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” No. 48/98), established as a body within the Ministry of the Interior;    The Sector on Antiterrorism, and   The Special Forces (Special Tasks Unit and the Rapid Deployment Unit), which are specially trained and responsible for acting in situation of crisis, such as: hostage situations, hijacking airplanes etc., as well as defeating direct resistance.   Ministry of Defence    Sector for Security and Intelligence;    Directorate on Money Laundering Prevention, which represents an administrative model of a financial intelligence unit, and acts as a mediator between the law-enforcement bodies and the private sector in preventing financing of terrorism (Law on Preventing of Laundering Money and other Proceeds of Crime, ”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No.46/04).     The Intelligence Agency, the Ministry of the Interior through the relevant units, within their competencies, gather data and information for detecting, monitoring, documentation and surveillance of the activity of individuals and groups, illegal groups and organisations, as well as the activities of foreign international terrorist organisations, groups and individuals intended toward endangering the constitutional system of the Republic of Macedonia, and its political, economic and other interests at home and abroad. Moreover, these services work on prevention and suppression of terrorist threats, detection of the perpetrators of terrorist acts and other crimes related to the terrorism, detecting and disassembling explosives devices and conducting negotiations in hostage situations.  5. Which national bodies co-ordinate the fight against terrorism? 
In line with the commitments stemming from the UN Resolution 1267 (1999), on 25.06.2002 the Government of the Republic of Macedonia established an Interdepartmental Coordinative Body, which is entrusted with the coordination of all the activities for fight against international terrorism, including the implementation of the Resolution 1373 from 2001. The body was established within the Ministry of Foreign Affairs and consists of representatives from: the Ministry of the Interior, the Ministry of Defence, the Ministry of Justice, the Ministry of Finance and the Intelligence Agency.   Pursuant to the Decision of the President of the Republic of Macedonia and the President of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia (DT No. 07-9 from 17.09.2003 and DT No. 66/1 from 1.09.2003), security services and agencies (Sector for Security and Intelligence within the Ministry of Defence, State Security and Counter-intelligence Service within the Ministry of the Interior, and the Intelligence Agency) participating in the fight against terrorism, exchange data and information on the existence of terrorist threats, on preparation and detection of terrorist activities and on their perpetrators on regular basis. In cases of perpetrated acts of terrorism, or activities related to terrorist acts (preparing, conspiring, etc), the competent Public Prosecutor coordinates the investigation, in accordance with his competencies prescribed by the Law on Public Prosecutor’s Office (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” No.38/04), and undertakes necessary measures for collection of evidence for initiating a criminal procedure. The Public Prosecutor coordinates the work of all services involved in the detection of perpetrators of terrorist acts, especially of the Ministry of the Interior. The newly formed Unit for Organised Crime, pursuant to Article 29 of the Law on Public Prosecutor’s Office, has competencies in opposing crime of terrorism and other crimes related to terrorism. For more details, see 24_I_02
6. What is the role and input of security and intelligence services? 
Security services of the Republic of Macedonia perform their activities in the field of security in compliance with the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” Nos. 52/91, 1/92, 31/98, 91/01 and 84/03), the Law on Intelligence Agency  (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” No.19/95), the Law on Internal Affairs (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” Nos.19/95, 55/97, 38/02, 22/03 and 19/04), the Defence Law (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” No.42/01), the National Security and Defence Strategy (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” No.40/03) and the Annual Operational Guidelines for the Security Services. The Ministry of the Interior (The Directorate for State Security and Counter-intelligence), the Intelligence Agency and the Sector for Security and Intelligence within the Ministry of Defence act towards opposing all forms of terrorist activities in the Republic of Macedonia and abroad. Within their competencies, these services investigate the activities of individuals, groups and organisations connected to financing, preparing, organising, supporting and performing terrorist related activities.  The security services also investigate individuals, groups and organisations which may abuse the territory of the Republic of Macedonia for preparing, organizing and performing terrorist attacks against other countries. Security services cooperate with corresponding foreign security services. The connections and relations of the terrorist threats with the smuggling of arms, narcotics and trafficking in human beings, as well as smuggling of radioactive, chemical and biological substances suitable for construction of weapons of mass destruction, are also investigated. For early detection of potential terrorist threats, the security services of the Republic of Macedonia undertake the following measures:    Collecting data from citizens;   Using data from public sources;   Inspection into the registers and databases;   Using secret collaborators;  Application of secret measures and activities (Communications monitoring, secret observation, surveillance and audio-visual recording of persons and objects with technical means)   Keeping records and data registers;   Carrying out security checks for persons, whose stay may be relevant to the national security.   Providing counter-intelligence protection of persons and facilities.  According to their constitutional and legal competencies, the security services submit an annual report to the President of the Republic of Macedonia, the President of the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Macedonia. The data delivered to these bodies are treated as a state secret, unless otherwise is decided.  The security services report to the Public Prosecutor's Office on indications for preparing or committing an act of terrorism.   The Draft-Law on Communication Interceptions is in parliamentary procedure. The legal ground for this law is provided by the Amendment XIX to the Constitution (“”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”” No.84/03).  7. Are there specialised bodies dealing with the financing of terrorism? 
In the Republic of Macedonia, there is no specialised body dealing with investigation of financing terrorism. The financing of any criminal activity is dealt with by the following institutions: the Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering and the Financial Police. The other law-enforcement agencies investigate the financial aspect of criminal activities through their specialised units for financial crime, and in cooperation with other relevant administrative bodies: the Public Revenues Office, the State Foreign Exchange Inspectorate, the Securities and Exchange Commission and the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia. The Intelligence Agency, within its organisational structure has a separate department which performs intelligence on the activity of international organisations and structures providing funds for terrorist activity by illegal trade, money laundering, suspicious financial transactions and transfer of capital gained from crime. Within its responsibilities under the Law on Prevention of Laundering of Money and Other Proceeds from Crime, the Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering monitors the suspicious transactions possibly related to terrorist activity. If the Directorate suspects that an offence of money laundering or financing terrorism is being committed, it is obliged by Law to submit an initiative to the corresponding Public Prosecutor, no latter than 24 hours of the moment of realisation of the suspcious transaction. The Public Prosecutor may under the Law suspend the transaction and temporary seize the money or the property.  8. What is done to provide concerned staff with specialised training? 
The education and training of the Police is based on theoretical and practical capacity building. It is mainly organised and performed by the Police Academy. Additionally, officers participate at training courses and seminars organised by partner services and states. In the Police Academy, experts from the Ministry perform a course entitled “Basic Course for anti-terrorist and counter-diversion protection”, basically for the needs of the airport and border security.   Officers from the specialised units attend training courses and seminars, organised by other partner countries and services, such as the course “Counter measures for protection from explosions” and “Procedures after bombings” organised by the Department of State - Bureau of Diplomatic Security’s Antiterrorism Assistance Program (DS/ATA); “Course for Dealing with hostage situations”, organised by the US Embassy in Budapest and the Centre for Fight Against Terrorism for South East Europe; “Course for disassembling explosive devices" organised by the Police of Turkey; “Fight against Terrorism and Illegal Trade” organised by the PFP – Turkish Training Centre; the seminar “Legal Aspects in the Fight Against Terrorism” organised by the USA Military Institute for international Legal Studies and the US Embassy in the Republic of Macedonia; “Fight Against Terrorism in South East Europe and future directions of SEDAM”, organised by NATO, etc.  9. Provide information on existing bilateral and international co-operation (including liaison officers and magistrates). 
Recognising the international dimension of terrorist activities, and the necessity for joint action in their suppression, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the responsible agencies develop the cooperation with other countries, international organisations and institutions. In this context, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia has, so far, concluded agreements for bilateral cooperation in the fight against terrorism with the Governments of: Turkey (1992); Slovenia (1995); Croatia (1997); Bulgaria (2002); Serbia (2003); Montenegro (2003); Romania (2003); Albania (2004). The security services of the Republic of Macedonia, in accomplishing their duties on suppression of terrorism, continually exchange data with representatives of foreign security services and expert teams.  Intelligence is exchanged through appointed liaison officers in the Republic of Macedonia. Currently, a direct cooperation is established with services and agencies of: Albania, Bulgaria, United Kingdom, Germany, Greece, Italy, USA, Russian Federation, the French Republic, Turkey, Croatia.   Likewise, cooperation and direct contacts are established with competent representatives of Serbia and Montenegro, Slovakia, and the UN Mission in Kosovo- UNMIK.  Within the SECI Centre in Bucharest liaison officers are detached from the Ministry of the Interior and the Customs Administration. A representative from the Sector for Anti-terrorism of the Ministry of the Interior participates in the work of the “Working Group for anti-terrorism”, chaired by the Republic of Turkey. The need for harmonisation of interests and establishing a joint strategy of the countries of South East Europe for prevention and suppression of threats stemming from international terrorism has resulted in establishing regional cooperation on multilateral level - the South East Europe Intelligence Conference-SEEIC. The Intelligence Agency oif the Republic of Macedonia and the Directorate for State Security and Counterintelligence are permanent members thereof.  The Intelligence Agency, within the diplomatic missions abroad, has detached 5 (five) liaison Officers (Croatia, Albania, Bulgaria, Turkey and Serbia and Montenegro), that are directly involved in the bilateral cooperation with the intelligence services of the mentioned states in the fight against terrorism.  10. Provide information on the creation of electronic data banks (statistics, profiling of terrorists etc.). 
The Ministry of the Interior collects processes and uses personal and other data on perpetrators of all types of criminal offences, including the criminal offence of terrorism and other crimes related to terrorism. These data are entered in the central IT system of the Ministry. Separate registers are kept also for the persons who are on domestic or international wanted lists. In the Republic of Macedonia, there is no separate statistics and database exclusively related to the perpetrators of the criminal offence of Terrorism or criminal offences related to terrorism. However, the security services classify and enter relevant data in the computer system (acquired during their operative work, data exchange with related services or from public sources). Furthermore, these data are appropriately processed and stored in databases for terrorist or other illegal activity related to terrorism.  
I. ORGANISED CRIME AND FRAUD 

1. Please provide information on national legislation or other rules governing this area, and their adhesion to relevant international conventions. 
In recent years, the Republic of Macedonia achieved significant progress in implementation of the European and other international standards that facilitate cooperation in the fight against severe forms of crime, especially in the fight against organised crime, corruption and money laundering, as well as in harmonisation of the national legislation with the relevant international Conventions. Regarding this, the Republic of Macedonia signed and ratified many international Conventions aligning its legislation to the provisions and standards included in these documents. Thus far, the following Conventions were ratified:   The United Nations Convention against Transnational Organised Crime and Additional Protocols (2004);   The UN International Convention on Suppression of Terrorist Bombings (2004); and    The Convention on Suppression of Financing of Terrorism (2004).    The Criminal Law Convention on Corruption (1999);   The Civil Law Convention on Corruption (2002);   The Convention on Transfer of Sentenced Persons with Additional Protocols (1999);   The European Convention on Mutual Assistance in Criminal Matters (1999);   The European Convention on Extradition with Additional Protocols (1999);   The Convention on Laundering, Search, Seizure and Confiscation of Proceeds from Crime (2000);   The European Convention on Transfer of Proceedings in Criminal Matters (2004);   The European Convention on Suppression of Terrorism (2004);   The Convention on Cyber crime (2004); Ratification is pending on:   The Additional Protocol to the Criminal Law Convention on Corruption, and    The United Nations Convention against Corruption adopted by the UN General Assembly on 31.10.2003  In addition, the recommendations included in the reports on the Republic of Macedonia prepared by international organisations and institutions (the European Commission, GRECO, the Council of Europe Select Committee of Experts on the Evaluation of Anti-Money Laundering Measures PC-R-EV/MONEYVAL, the initiatives of the Stability Pact for SEE), were also taken into consideration when harmonizing the national legislation. In the national legislation, the following amendments were introduced: 1. Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia   On 26.12.2003, the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia passed the Draft Amendment XIX to the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia, amending  Article 17 of the Constitution (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 84/2003). With this Amendment, the interception of communications under certain conditions and procedure was legalised, which represents a legal basis for application of special investigative measures. 2. Amendments to the Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 19/2004), harmonised with the European and other international standards and solutions and creating legal grounds for suppression of organised crime and terrorism. These amendments introduced:   Criminal liability for legal entities;   The legal institute of confiscation of property and proceeds, and return of confiscated property to a third country;   New criminal offences: sanctioning of new forms of money laundering, financing of terrorism, cyber crime and smuggling of migrants; and    Redefinition of the sanction system by introducing an alternative punishment. 3. Amendments to the Law on Criminal Procedure (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 74/2004), harmonised with the EU legislation and with the provisions of the ratified international documents. These amendment prescribed:   Application of special investigative measures;   Measures for ensuring the presence of the defendant in the course of procedure;   Protection of witnesses, collaborators of justice and victims of crime;   Legal procedures against legal entities;   New legal solutions in respect of the procedure for seizure, freezing and confiscation of property in order to enhance the implementation of the Vienna Convention against Traffic of Narcotics Drugs and Psychotropic Substances and the Strasbourg Convention on Money Laundering, Search, Seizure and Confiscation of Proceeds from Crime;   Procedures for enhancing the transfer of sentenced persons. 4. Amendments to the Law on Prevention of Money Laundering and Other Proceeds from Crime (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No.  46/2004). These amendments ensure:   More efficient system of preventive measures and activities against money laundering and financing of terrorism; and    Harmonisation of the national law with the provisions of the international documents (the UN Convention against Transnational Organised Crime, EU Council Directive 91/308/EEC of 10.06.1991 on Prevention of Use of the Financial System for the Purpose of Money Laundering, and the EU Directive 2001/97/ЕЕС of 2001, amending the Directive of 1991, as well as the FATF Forty Recommendations on Prevention of Money Laundering, and the FATF Eight Special Recommendations on Financing of Terrorism). 5. Amendments to the Law on Prevention of Corruption (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 83/04 – consolidated text). These amendments ensure:   higher level of autonomy and independence of the State Commission for Prevention of Corruption by gaining capacity of a legal entity;   enhancement of the role of the State Commission for Prevention of Corruption in protection of its members and of persons dealing with prevention of corruption; and   strengthening the limitation of using the budgetary funds. 6. The new Law on Public Prosecutor’s Office (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 38/2004):   Introduced a separate unit (established in September 2004) for fight against organised crime and corruption within the Office of the Prosecutor General with prosecutors specialised for combating organised crime (in conformity with the recommendations of the Council of Europe, GRECO, the London Conference of the EU Troika for Justice and Home Affairs and other international organisations and institutions for combating corruption);   Enhanced the position and autonomy of the Public Prosecutor;   Established a council of prosecutors as an advisory body; and   Prescribed a possibility to put members from the Ministry of the Interior and other responsible institutions on disposal of the Public Prosecutor.  7. The Draft Law on Witness Protection which is in Parliamentary procedure. 8. The Draft Law on Interception of Communications which should establish the conditions, manner and procedure for use of this measure, is also in drafting procedure
2. Please provide an overview of your activities to implement the action-oriented measures that were adopted by the Government as a follow-up to the London Conference and presented at the EU-Western Balkans JHA ministerial meeting of 28 November 2003. 
In accordance with the obligations undertaken at the London Conference on fight against organised crime in South East Europe (held on 25.11.2002) and the meeting of the EU Troika in the field of Justice and Home Affairs (held in Thessalonica on 22.04.2003), the Republic of Macedonia prepared a document - Specific Action – Oriented Measures against Organised Crime in Republic of Macedonia, dated 10.11.2003, which was presented at the EU Troika Ministerial Meeting in the field of Justice and Home Affairs, held in Brussels, on 28.11.2003.  The fulfilment of the agreed activities and the realisation of the priorities planned in the document, are monitored by the Sector for European Integration (SEI) within the General Secretariat of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia.  At the joint meetings with the competent bodies that have a duty to carry out the established measures, information regarding the activities are presented and further measures and activities are coordinated. Simultaneously, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia is informed about the course of the measures and accomplished results. The Document - Specific Action – Oriented Measures against Organised Crime in Republic of Macedonia has the following priority Measures: Priority 1: Regional Network of Prosecutors. 
  A Memorandum of Understanding and Cooperation between the countries of Western Balkans is in its final phase of preparation;   The Unit for fight against organised crime and corruption within the Public Prosecutor’s Office was established and became operational;   The Public Prosecutor’s Office assigned prosecutors for prosecution of criminal offences in the field of organised crime and corruption. Their training is in progress;   The Public Prosecutor enacted the secondary legislation for implementation of the Law on Public Prosecutor’s office (as well as the Rulebook on Internal Operation of the Public Prosecutors and the Rulebook on Organisation and Operation of the Section for Prosecution of Offenders in the Field of Organised Crime and Corruption);    In a view of strengthening the fight against organised crime, a National Workshop on basic practical aspects related to detection of organised crime was realised. 
Priority 1’: Regional justice cooperation (regional justice collaborators and witness protection)  
  The Law Amending the Law on Criminal Procedure (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 74/2004) has been enacted, and the procedure for adoption of the Law on Witness Protection has commenced;   The Ministers of Justice and Home Affairs of the countries of South Eastern Europe, on 18.05.2004, in Bucharest, Romania, signed a Joint Statement on joint campaign against organised crime and corruption in South East Europe within the activities of the SEECP(South East European Cooperation process);   The Ministry of Justice prepared an Estimate of the total costs for equipment and installation of video-conference room for hearing of witnesses;   Through the European Agency for Reconstruction a total of 375.000 EUR are provided for equipping of three video-conference courtrooms for hearing of witnesses; 
Priority 2: Ministry of Finance - strengthening of the capacity for prevention of money laundering and financial crime and regional exchange of information    The Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia enacted a new Law on Money Laundering and Other Proceeds from Crime (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 46/04);   The necessary amendments on the Law on Financial Police due to special authorisation of the Financial Police as a competent body for law enforcement are drafted.    The Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering signed bilateral Memorandums of Understanding and Letters on Exchange of Confidential Information with the Institutions for Prevention of Money Laundering of Republic of Croatia, State Union of Serbia and Montenegro,Republic of Albania, Romania and Ukraine.   A new Director of the Directorate for Money Laundering Prevention was appointed;    A system of electronic information exchange between the financial institutions is established.   The Directorate is included in the implementation of the regional CARDS programme for development of efficient and functional police systems, strengthening the fight against main criminal activity and cooperation between the police. In cooperation with the Council of Europe, the Directorate, on 06.09.2004 organised a Workshop for all institutions involved in the fight against money laundering, which marked the beginning of the project.   The Directorate is a leading partner in the implementation of the National CARDS programme 2002 for strengthening the fight against money laundering (0.7M EUR), which has already started. This Project will last for 18 months and involves fulfilment of several goals:    Strengthening the existing capacity of the Directorate,    Revision of the legislation    Assistance in creation of a system of processing, analysis and protection of information,   Establishing mechanisms for cooperation between the Directorate and the law enforcement agencies,   Strengthening the capacity of the police, Public Prosecutors’ Office and the judiciary.   At the 12th meeting of the EGMONT Group, the Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering is accepted as a new member;   The Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering has made additional efforts to strengthen its own capacity and increases the number of employees from 4 to 8 officers and provides specialist training for all employees;     A progress in terms of logistics support to the Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering is attained, whereby an alarm system is installed and a vehicle is provided.  Providing new office premises is in procedure. 
Priority 3: Setting up a Special Unit for Fight against Organised Crime and Corruption within the Public Prosecutor’s Office of the Republic of Macedonia    The Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia enacted the Law on Public Prosecutor’s Office (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 38/04);   In accordance with the prepared project, the Unit for Fight against Organised Crime and Corruption within the Public Prosecutor’s Office has been established and has become operational;   Providing new office premises for the Public Prosecutor of the Republic of Macedonia is in  procedure;   The Public Prosecutor’s Office enacted the Rules for Operation of the Public Prosecutor’s Office and Rules for Operation of the Unit for Fight against Organised Crime and Corruption. At the same time, all secondary legislation was adopted.   The Public Prosecutor’s Office, according to the legal regulations, has strengthened the cooperation with relevant institutions in the field of organised crime and corruption (the Ministry of Interior, the Customs Administration of the RM, the Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering, the Public Revenue Office, the Financial Police). These institutions agreed to prepare a Memorandum of Cooperation, hold regular meetings, appoint contact persons and hold regular meetings on a local level. Thus far, three meetings (on regular monthly basis) of the Joint Group are held, and for the purpose of exchange, collection and data analysis, a practice of holding regular meetings between relevant institutions on a regional and local level has been established.    The training of assigned prosecutors in the Unit for Fight against Organised Crime and Corruption is ongoing. Language and computer courses are introduced as supplementary to the specific nature of their job. 
Priority 4: Specialised training of Judges to fight organised crime. 
  Judges that will proceed in cases from the field of organised crime have been assigned;    The training of these judges is in procedure.  
Priority 5: Department for Organised Crime  
  According to the Action Plan for Police reform, in January 2005, the Department for Organised Crime within the Ministry of the Interior became operational. The preconditions for work of this Department were created after a complete determination of the internal structure and the enactment of the Rulebook on Manners of Operation and the Rulebook on Systematisation of Working Posts with Description of Working Assignments and Required Qualification for Each Post. The Department is a central service competent on the entire territory of the Republic of Macedonia with approximately 300 executors. The concrete needs for financial-technical equipment and IT support for the Department have been determined.  
Priority 6: Central Criminal Intelligence Unit         
  A Coordinative Body, which is comprised of all institutions involved in the fight against organised crime and corruption (Ministry of the Interior, Public Prosecutor’s Office, Ministry of Finance-Customs Administration, Directorate for Money laundering Prevention, Financial Police, Public Revenues Office) has been established. This Body has a role of a Centre where the representatives from the abovementioned institutions will meet on a regular basis for the purpose of collection, analysis and exchange of information. The representatives of the institutions have a role of liaison officers, which are in direct 24 hours, mutual communication.    A Memorandum on Cooperation between the institutions has been prepared by the Public Prosecutor’s Office. Its signing is pending.   A training of 10 analysts is carried out in order to strengthen the capacity of the Section for Criminal Intelligence Analysis, as well as for the needs of the organisational unit in this field  foreseen by the reform processes in the Ministry of the Interior.  
3. What particular types of crime, especially organised crime, does your country have to deal with? Please provide statistics. 
In the past several years (2001, 2002, 2003 and during the nine months of the 2004) a total of 74.297 criminal offences were registered in the Republic of Macedonia.  Out of this number, the largest part, or 90,6% are criminal offences in the field of classic types of crime, 5,5% are criminal offences in the field of commercial and financial crime, 2,8% are criminal offences in the field of illegal trade, and 1,1% are criminal offences in the field of organised crime. This numbers are shown in the Table number 1 separately for each year: Table number 1 Total of registered criminal offences Types of  Crimes 2001 2002 2003 9 months of 2004 Total Total of registered criminal offences 17.139 18.308 22.547 16.303 74.297 Criminal offences in the field of classic crime 15.749 16.843 20.018 14.686 67.296 Criminal offences in the field of commercial crime 669 756 1.663 1.028 4.116 Criminal offences in the field of illegal trade 526 487 644 432 2.089 Criminal offences in the field of organised crime 195 222 222 157 796 Source: Ministry of the Interior  This division into types of criminal offences is made according to the Classification of criminal acts in the Republic of Macedonia  (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 60/97).  In the field of classic crime, the activities of the Ministry of the Interior were particularly directed towards dealing with criminal offences against life and body; fundamental human rights and freedoms; freedoms and rights of citizens; sexual freedom and sexual morality; marriage, family and youth; property; general safety of people and property and; safety in legal traffic and legal order. In the field of commercial crimes, the criminal offences against public finances, payment operations, economic order, official duty, environment and against production are dominant. In the field of illegal trade, the most typical are the various forms of smuggling, illegal trade with weapons, narcotic drugs etc.   In the following table, the most typical criminal offences in various fields of crime are presented. Table number 2 Registered criminal offences More characteristic  criminal offences 2001 2002 2003 9 months of 2004 total of  criminal offences Murder 56 61 73 36 226 Severe body injury 188 203 231 183 805 Aggravated theft 8.193 8.370 9.128 6.891 32.582 Banditry 252 447 548 554 1.801 Taking away a motor vehicle 511 576 560 570 2.217 Fraud 313 345 534 450 1.642 Extortion 16 28 31 32 107 Blackmail 1    2 3 Act of violence 68 95 109 54 326 Kidnapping 6 20 18 19 63 Abuse of official duty 168 178 854 408 1.608 Counterfeiting official document 86 76 80 105 347 Embezzlement in the service 22 71 66 31 190 Receiving a bribe  20 13 46 Giving a bribe 15 39 Intermediation in prostitution 31 17 27 21 96 Rape 39 36 56 35 166 Sexual attack upon a child  44 56 52 29 181 Illegal crossing of state border  26 47 Founding a slave relationship  14 Trafficking in human beings 18 42 11 71 Illicit drug trade 348 282 406 273 1.309 Illicit arms trade 138 153 213 151 655 Terrorism 46 27 16 91 Counterfeiting money 145 177 144 91 557 Source: Ministry of the Interior  In the field of organised crime, criminal offences of corruption and corruptive behaviour, trafficking in human beings and forced prostitution are the most represented crimes. For the purpose of suppression of these crimes, significant activities have been carried out and several police investigations related to cases of corruptive behaviour and malversation in the field of economic and financial operations have been conducted and documented. In addition, the activities in the field of trafficking in human beings have been intensified through performing frequent controls in the catering facilities. Beside the aforementioned, activities in a great number of cases in the field of counterfeiting and crimes with violent elements were also carried out. Out of the realised police investigations in the field of financial operations and economy, in the framework of privatisation, i.e. restructuring of enterprises, many cases of malversations carried out by directors, managers and other managerial staff in cooperation with persons from private enterprises; cases of malversations in the public procurements and; other illegal transactions within the Public Sector have been detected. Furthermore, in the field of classical forms of corruption, the criminal offences of receiving and giving bribe have been detected, and in most of the cases the act of giving a bribe is committed by giving financial means to an official person in order to perform, or to refrain from performing official acts.     Continuous and organised activities have been carried out for detecting the main agents of criminal activities related to trafficking in human beings and counterfeiting of money. Still, regarding the cases of counterfeiting money, most of them involve releasing counterfeited banknotes in circulation by individuals. More organised forms of production of counterfeited banknotes and their release in circulation are less present.  In the following Table, statistical data on the number of registered criminal offences in the field of organised crime in the 2001, 2002, 2003 and nine months of 2004 are presented. CRIMES IN THE FIELD OF ORGANISED CRIME 
2001 2002 2003 9 months of 2004 
LEGAL CLASSIFICATION Criminal offences Criminal offences Criminal offences Criminal offences Unauthorised production and release in trade of narcotics, psychotropic substances and precursor (Art. 215, p.2) 13 9  9 18 Unauthorised procurement and possesion of nuclear materials (Art. 231) / / / / Extortion (Art.258, p.2) Counterfeiting Money (Art. 268) 154 177 144 91 Money laundering and other unlawful property gain (Art.273) Trafficking (Art.278, p.2) 44 69 Receiving a bribe (Art. 357) 20 13 Giving a bribe (Art. 358) 15 Unlawful intermediation (Art. 359) Disclosing an official secret (Art.360) Manufacture and acquisition of weapons and means intended for commiting a crime (Art.395) / 1 /  / Traficking in human beings (Art.419) 18 42 11 TOTAl 203 236 257 221 The source of the presented statistical data are the records and data from the Ministry of the Interior and are in compliance with the Law on Classification of Criminal Acts in the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 60/97).  
4. Specify if there is a proven international dimension of organised crime in your country 
The data and information collected thus far, as well as the analysis of detected cases and current assesments, indicate an existence of links between criminal groups active on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia and criminal groups active on the territories of the countries of Central and Eastern Europe (Bulgaria, Russia, Albania, Czech Republic), Turkey, Middle East countries, and in particularly with the criminal groups active on the territory of the countries and territories created after the collapse of the former Yugoslavia (Serbia and Montenegro, Croatia, Bosnia and Herzegovina, and Kosovo). However, there are indications that criminal groups from the Republic of Macedonia are linked with organised criminal groups from Western European countries as well, which in fact represent a final destinations of the criminal activity. The links between these groups are particularly visible in the field of illicit trade in narcotics and psychotropic substances, smuggling of persons, smuggling of excise goods, illegal trade in weapons and stolen luxury motor vehicles. According to the experience in this field, the illicit trade in narcotics and psychotropic substances could be taken as a specific example. This illicit trade in fact presents a part of the activities of the so-called Balkan drugs route, where the Republic of Macedonia is a transit area and due to its small and non-profitable market, only a small part of the drugs which come from the Middle East and Turkey and are intended for the West European narcotics markets remains on its territory. The Republic of Macedonia is also a transit part of the international smuggling channels for smuggling of human beings across state border from high migration-risk countries to the countries of Western Europe.  International connections between the criminal groups involved in illegal trade of weapons have also been noted. This channel is well developed and organised by criminal structures from the Republic of Macedonia, Albania and other Western Balkans countries, mainly because the current situations and events on the Balkans, inclusive of the Republic of Macedonia, provide possibilities for increased profit. In regard to smuggling of excise goods, the territory of the Republic of Macedonia is primarily a transit area, but also a final destination for certain smuggled goods that in substantial quantities are sold on the illegal market. The phenomenon of trafficking in human beings, especially of women for the purpose of forced prostitution has an international dimension. The Republic of Macedonia may appear as a final destination and for this reason the following channels are used: Moldova-Romania-Serbia and Montenegro-Republic of Macedonia and Romania-Bulgaria-Republic of Macedonia or Moldova-Romania-Republic of Macedonia; and as a transit state with Albania being the final destination, while a part ending on the white slavery markets of other European countries. Connections between international criminal groups and criminal groups in the Republic of Macedonia also exist in the cases of smuggling of stolen vehicles from Western Europe and Republic of Macedonia that end up on the illegal markets in Eastern Europe and in the neighbouring countries.  5. What are the main elements of your policy dealing with organised crime? 
For efficient fight and identification of all varieties and types of organised crime, a priority in the fight against this type of crime is establishing of basic conditions such as:    Efficient penetration of the Law Enforcing Agencies into the criminal environment and criminal groups, for the purpose of detecting, identifying and providing evidence for the criminal activity of the main participants using legally prescribed methods and means;    Establishing and improvement of the cooperation between the Police and the citizens;   Suppression of all types of organised crime behaviour;   Suppression of  corruption;    Prevention of money laundering  and other proceeds from criminal offences, and    Confiscation of proceeds gained from crime. For that purpose, the following activities are necessary:    Consistent enforcement of the international instruments and harmonisation of the national legislation with the European Union legislation and United Nation’s standards pertaining to combat and repression of organised crime, corruption and money laundering, taking into consideration the recommendations incorporated in the Reports on the Republic of Macedonia, prepared by some international organisations and institutions (the European Commission, GRECO, The Select Committee of Experts on the Evaluation of Anti-Money Laundering Measures PC-R-V/MONEVAL, Initiatives of the Stability Pact for SEE, etc.);   Completion of activities and consistent implementation of the Document – Specific Action – Oriented Measures against Organised Crime in Republic of Macedonia, adopted by the Government of Republic of Macedonia as a follow-up activity of the London Conference, and presented to the EU – Western Balkans Justice and Home Affairs Ministerial Meeting, held on 28.11.2003;     Providing an impartial, expert, legally based and collective operation of the police officers in detection of organised crime, as well as synchronised and coordinated acting of all subjects and institutions of the system responsible for fight and suppression of organised crime, corruption and money laundering;   Successful detection and prevention of corruptive behaviour in all segments and levels of state administration, as well as elimination of all conditions contributing towards criminal behaviour occurrence, and prevention of potential connections between the criminal groups and groups of civil servants for the purpose of committing crimes in the field of organised crime;   A consistent enforcement  of the criminal law provisions, for the purpose of fulfilment of “the crime does not pay” principle and to impede the laundering of criminally gained and dirty money;   Continuous training of authorised officers who perform duties and tasks of crime suppression, and their adequate equipping with necessary technical means;    Permanent adjustment in the organisation of the subjects responsible for fight against organised crime in line to respond to the challenges of this type of crime whit a coordinated and organised joint action on the entire territory of the Republic of Macedonia, followed by, as few as possible, formal obstacles in the enforcement of the operational processing, with clear vertical hierarchy of management;   Establishment of independent and efficient judiciary;    Prompt management and completion in a reasonable and legally prescribed period of the criminal proceedings, which are carried out in relation to committed criminal offences of all types, and especially of those in relation to organised crime, and    Intensifying, broadening, maintenance and enhancement of all forms of international police cooperation for the purpose of more successful detection and repression of organised crime, as well as exchange of data and information in relation to it. 
6. Is there a system allowing for confiscation/seizure of proceeds from crime? 
The criminal law concept of Confiscation of proceeds from crime is established with the Law Amending the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 19/04). This concept, although it was functioning in a different form before the adoption of this amendments (seizure of proceeds), is a major step forward in suppression of illicit earning of persons connected to organised crime.    The substance of this concept is regulated within a separate Chapter of the Criminal Code ("Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia, Nos. 37/96, 80/99, 4/02 and 19/04) where the provisions stipulate the grounds and the methods for confiscation. The confiscation from a legal entity and the protection of an injured Party is regulated as well. The procedure for confiscation is regulated with the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 15/97, 44/02 and 74/04).  According to the provision of the Criminal Code, it is prescribed that a person may not retain an indirect or direct profit acquired through crime. The provisions of the Law prescribe that the proceeds acquired in such manner shall be confiscated with a court decision with which the fact of perpetration of the criminal offence was established. The Court will bring a decision on confiscation in a procedure determined by law even when, because of factual or legal obstacles the criminal procedure against the perpetrator of the criminal offence is impossible. The Criminal Code also contains a provision stipulating that the confiscated property may be returned to another state under conditions determined by a ratified international agreement. In accordance with the legal provisions, the confiscation of the proceeds from crime consists of confiscating money, movable or real-estate objects of value, as well as any other title, property or assets, material or non-material rights. Furthermore, if the aforementioned confiscation is not possible, the Law stipulates the possibility of confiscation of another property from the perpetrator in the amount corresponding to the proceeds acquired through crime.   The confiscation of the proceeds may be enforced on third persons as well, to whom they were transferred without appropriate compensation, if they did not know although they were able to know or had the duty to know that the proceeds were acquired through crime.  The Criminal Code prescribes a special regime of confiscation of objects that are declared as cultural heritage and natural heritage, as well as those objects to which the injured party is personally linked. Namely, they shall be confiscated from third persons, irrespective of the fact that they did not know or were not able, nor they have duty to know that the proceeds were acquired from crime, and irrespective of whether the title on the objects was transferred to them with appropriate compensation.  As a rule, the confiscated goods are returned to the injured party. If there is no Injured party, the confiscated property become state ownership. Within the Criminal Code there is a provision for protection of the injured party. Namely, the injured party that within a criminal procedure referrs to litigation with regards to its property claim, may request to be compensated from the amount of the confiscated value, within a legally prescribed timeframe. Within the Criminal Code there is a provision for protection of the injured party that did not submit property claim during the criminal procedure. Namely, the injured party may request settlement from the amount of the confiscated value, if for the purpose of determining the claim, they instigated litigation within a legally prescribed timeframe.  In the fight against organised crime and corruption, of particular significance is the novelty of introducing criminal law liability of legal entities, and the legal possibility for confiscation of acquired proceeds from crime from a legal entity.    The procedure for implementation and enforcement of the confiscation of property and proceeds is regulated by the Law on Criminal Procedure. The provision of the Law stipulate that the enforcement of the confiscation shall be carried out within 30 days from the day when the sentence became final, and on the basis of an enforcement order issued by the Court that brought the sentence in the first instance. The Law determines that the execution shall be carried out from the property and proceeds established with a court decision, and if that is partially or entirely not possible, the execution shall be carried out from the rest of the property of the person against whom that measure is pronounced.  The Law contains also a provision that prevent possible abuses after committing the criminal offence. Namely, the legal acts concluded after perpetration of the criminal offence, and with the intention to decrease the value of the proceeds which are subject of confiscation, are invalid, according to the law. 
7. Describe the specific institutions/bodies/departments/court chambers set up to fight organised crime (including data on staff, budgetary allocations and equipment in this area). How do you ensure special training of law enforcement officers including prosecutors and judges in this area? 
The Ministry of the Interior  As one of the priorities in the fight against organised crime, within the Ministry of the Interior a Department for Organised Crime was formed. With its forming, the level of this service was upgraded, with ramification of its structure and introduction of specialised units for different types of crime. These special units are formed for implementation of special investigative techniques as well. The depertment will deepen the cooperation realised untill now among the former Sector, other State institutions and police services of third countries. Strengthened is the function of criminal intelligence and analyse, situated in particular Sector. This Sector gathers data and information that point to various forms of illegal behaviour; analyses and processes the gathered information, especially those indicating crimes of criminal groups and: utilises and hands over information and analysis necessary for preparation, planning and implementation of operative-criminalistics processing. Furthermore, the Department for Organised Crime, in cooperation with other organisational units prepares, plans and implements operative-criminalistics processing of criminal groups active on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia, or those with connections abroad; analyses the situation, the movement and the phenomenal forms of the crime; finds the most appropriate solutions for prevention and suppression of organised crime and; performs other activities in the field of organised crime.  The Department for Organised Crime, according to the current systematisation of positions has 135 criminal inspectors and its work is managed by the Head of the Department. In the framework of the Criminal Police, at the 12 regional Sections and 23 Sectors of Internal Affairs, there are units and inspectorates for suppression of organised crime. The total number of police personnel that perform tasks on suppression of organised crime is 116 inspectors, including 21 officers at managerial positions Furthermore, the operative assets of the Department for Organised Crime and the regional organisational units are provided from the funds of the Ministry of the Interior. The Action Plan for Police Reform assesses the financial needs of the department on 4.734.000 EUR which partly will be secured form the budget of the Republic of Macedonia, and partly from the CARDS programme where already several projects are planned or are underway.  A specialised training of the police inspectors performing activities for suppression of organised crime is carried out through regular and extraordinary seminars and courses, which are organised in cooperation with the Police Academy. Furthermore, international seminars are organised in cooperation with the police services of other countries, governmental institutions, non-governmental organisations, etc.  In the framework of the Ministry of the Interior, within the Directorate for State Security and Counterintelligence, a Sector for Organised Crime deals with sophisticated forms of organised crime within the scope of work of the Directorate for State Security and Counterintelligence. This Sector operates with 40 operative employees. Public Prosecutor's Office One of the key institutions competent for combating organised crime in the Republic of Macedonia is the Public Prosecutor's Office. The new Law on the Public Prosecutor’s Office foresees establishing of a Unit for Fight against Organised Crime and Corruption within the Public Prosecutor’s Office. The Unit carries out activities ex officio; in respect of crimes committed by an organised group of at least 3 persons that perform activity for a certain period of time in order to acquire direct or indirect financial benefit, or other type of material benefit and shall commit one or more criminal offences and; in respect of other crimes for which a legally prescribed penalty is at least four year prison sentence. Following the prescribed competencies, the Unit acts before all competent Courts in the Republic of Macedonia. The Rulebook on the Organisation of the Unit stipulates that the Unit will be comprised of not more than 10 members (Public Prosecutors and Deputy Public Prosecutors). The concrete number of positions to be filled will depend on the volume of work of the Unit.  The staff of the Section is assigned by the Public Prosecutor of the Republic of Macedonia for a period of four years with an opportunity to be assigned again after the end of this period.  The training of the staff is carried out under the Program for Education organised by the Association of Public Prosecutors of the Republic of Macedonia in cooperation with the Centre for Continuing Education. Thus far, training has been organised on issues related to crimes in the field of trafficking in human beings as a most visible segment of  the organised crime. This activity has resulted in preparing of an Operative Manual intended for judges and public prosecutors and  Practice Book on specific practical aspects of this type of crime. Many seminars on topics related to corruption and money laundering and trafficking in human beings, in which large number of public prosecutors participated, have been organised, as well. Under the 2005 Budget (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia“, No. 96/04), 10.000.000 MKD were allocated for reconstruction and equipping of the Public Prosecutor’s Office. The funds for expenses of the Unit for Fight against Organised Crime and Corruption are also included in this amount.  Customs Administration The Customs Administration of the Republic of Macedonia has specific competencies in  the fight against organised crime and trafficking in human beings. The Customs Administration, implements its function of a law enforcement state body through the Sector for Control and Investigations. For the purpose of more efficient dealing with all new forms of organised crime and aimed at undertaking concerted actions with other state institutions, in particular with the Public Prosecutor’s Office and the judiciary, a joint training of the personnel of these institutions has been organised in the country and abroad. Hence, 12 Customs Officers from the Customs Administration of the Republic of Macedonia participated in trainings concerning issues of money laundering, crimes related to corruption, abuse of official position, trans-national organised crime, trafficking in human beings, financing terrorism, tax evasion, smuggling etc. In addition to the employees of the Customs Administration, representatives from the Public Prosecutor’s Office and the judiciary attended these training programmes as well, in order to facilitate the inter-connectivity of these institutions for the purpose of joint operation, coordination and successful realisation of the fight against the mentioned types of organised crime.     Under the 2005 Budget, 507.322.000 MKD are allocated for the Customs Administration. Part of these funds are designated for accomplishment of the basic priorities of the Customs Administration for 2005, such as enacting new Customs Law, preparing by-laws, fight against illicit trade in drugs, IT support for document excange, etc. Directorate for Prevention of  Money Laundering   The Law on Prevention of Money Laundering was adopted in 2001, after which the Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering  was established (operative since March, 2002) As a body within the Ministry of Finance, it operates as a mediator in the process of information exchange between the private sector and the state bodies competent for prosecution of the crime of money laundering. According to the provisions of the Rulebook on Organisation and Operation of the Ministry of Finance, the Directorate as an administrative model of Financial Intelligence Unit (FIU) is organised in three Departments: Department for Analyses, Department for Suspicious Transactions and Department for System Development and International Cooperation. The Department for Analyses is in charge of collecting information that, according to the provisions of the Law, are forwarded to the Directorate by other entities. If suspicion arises, after an analysis of a certain transaction was carried out, this Department submits a Report on the transaction to the Department for Suspicious Transactions for more detailed processing. The Department for Suspicious Transactions is in charge of undertaking procedures following reports on suspicious transactions submitted by entities obliged to do so by law, reports from competent state bodies and reports from competent bodies of other countries received through the Department for International Cooperation.   The Department for System Development and International Cooperation is competent to follow and study laws and secondary legislation that regulate the prevention of money laundering and financing of terrorism at national and international level.    The current number of employees at the Directorate is 8 persons assigned to each of the Departments at the Directorate. Their training is underway, and in the future it will continue through regular attendance of trainings and seminars organised under the CARDS 2002 project, or facilitated by other associations for technical assistance, such as GTZ and USAID. The operative costs or expenditures of the Directorate, funds for salaries, costs for lease of premises and fixed assets for regular operation are provided from the Budget of the Ministry of Finance. The Directorate is included in the preparation of the Budget of the Ministry of Finance, in terms of making projections for its own costs, which should be made depending on the activities that are foreseen in the concerned budgetary year. Under the budget of 2005, for the first time, in separate budget line, funds designated for capacity strengthening of the Direction were allocated (in total 3.672.000 MKD).  Financial Police The Law on Financial Police prescribes the competencies of an operational law enforcement agency for detection, prosecution, documentation and evidence gathering for committed financial crimes. This Law provides specialisation and specific competence in respect of detecting law offenders who are involved in activities related to the most complex forms of financial crime, tax evasion, money laundering, smuggling, illicit trade in goods and products or other forms of crimes which include non-payment of significant amounts of tax, customs duties, or represent legalisation of proceeds from crime. In case such crimes cannot be proven directly with the existing evidence, the Financial Police applies the method of circumstantial evidence regarding proceeds, as determined and systematised by the Law on Financial Police, as well as by other regulations in the field of finances.    The Financial Police is comprised of 10 financial police officers-economists and lawyers that especially for this purpose have been taken over from the Public Revenue Office, the Ministry of the Interior and the Public Prosecutor’s Office.  The Financial Police is a body within the Ministry of Finance and therefore is a part of the executive branch of the government. The Director of this Directorate is appointed by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia. He/She is accountable for his/her work to the Minister of Finance and the Government of the Republic of Macedonia. In light of the specific nature of their job, the selection and appointment of the financial police officers is conducted according to the Rulebook on Skills Testing and Assessment of Predispositions for Performing Financial Police Activities that prescribes special conditions for appointment.    For fight against finacial crime, for the first time under the Budget for 2005, in separate budget line 3.976.000 MKD were allocated. Training of Judges and Public Prosecutors in the field of fight against organised crime The Centre for Continuing Education organises training for judges in the Republic of Macedonia. In this respect, special attention is paid on training for fight against organised crime. In addition to judges, the Public Prosecutors too, actively participate in these programs. For more datails on the activities organised by the Centre for Continuing Education see charts given in answer 24_I_14.  Training organised by the Police Academy The Police Academy also provides training for staff involved in the fight against organised crime.  Organised crime as a topic is elaborated in the programs for basic police training and in the programs for graduate and postgraduate studies.    The Police Academy, in cooperation with the Ministry of the Interior, has prepared special program for basic training in the field of organised crime, which covers all persons (155 in total), that after the reform of the Ministry is finnished, will be assigned to work in the Department for Organised crime. This training programme started in mid January 2005 following the completion of the procedure for staff assignment. Considering the large size of this group, the training is carried out in 4 cycles. With the first cycle the managerial staff is covered and they will attend specialist management training in April 2005. The program for this training includes issues on organisational structure and competenceis of the newly established Department for Organised Crime, the latest amendments to the national legislation, the up to date methods of work and international documents and cooperation. The training provides for multidisciplinary approach with a special focus on inter-ministerial cooperation. For more details, see answer 24_G_098. How do you co-operate internationally in fighting organised crime and how do you ensure national coordination in this combat? How do you co-operate with the private sector, notably the banking sector? 
In the fight against organised crime, the Republic of Macedonia consistently applies the international standards and directions stemming from the ratified International Conventions and Protocols.  Numerous bilateral and multilateral agreements on cooperation in and strengthening of the fight against organised crime have been signed. The same was done in respect of mutual legal assistance in criminal matters, especially in the field of organised crime and severe forms of economic and financial crime, and on extradition of perpetrators of crimes. The representatives of the Ministries of Justice and Home Affairs of the countries of South East Europe, among which is the Republic of Macedonia, have signed a Joint Statement on Strengthening the Regional Cooperation in the field of Organised Crime and Corruption on 18.05.2004.  Bilateral agreements with several countries have been concluded as well. Such as :   Agreement between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Slovenia on Cooperation against Terrorism and Organised Crime (1995);   Agreement between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Croatia on Cooperation against International Trade in Drugs and Psychotropic Substances, International Terrorism and Organised Crime (1997);     Agreement between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Bulgaria on Cooperation in the Fight Against Terrorism, Organised Crime, Illegal Traffic with Narcotic Drugs, Psychotropic Substances and Precursors, Illegal Migration and Other Criminal Offences (2003);   Agreement between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Montenegro on Cooperation in the Fight Against Terrorism, Organised Crime, Illegal Traffic with Narcotic Drugs, Psychotropic Substances and Precursors, Illegal Migration and Other Criminal Offences (2003);   Agreement between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Serbia on Cooperation in the Fight Against Terrorism, Organised Crime, Illegal Traffic with Narcotic Drugs, Psychotropic Substances and Precursors, Illegal Migration and Other Criminal Offences ;   Agreement between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of Romania, on Cooperation in the Fight Against Terrorism, Organised Crime, Illegal Traffic with Narcotic drugs, Psychotropic Substances and Precursors, and Other Illegal Activities, and     Agreement between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Council of Ministers of the Republic of Albania on Cooperation in the Fight Against Terrorism, Organised Crime, Illegal Traffic with Narcotic drugs, Psychotropic Substances and Precursors, Illegal Migration and Other Illegal Activities. The Police cooperation with third countries is carried out through the Sector for European Integration and International Cooperation within the Ministry of the Interior. This cooperation is carried out through INTERPOL liaison officers and channels, the SECI (South-Eastern Europe Cooperation Initiative) liaison officers, and liaison officers from third countries appointed in the Republic of Macedonia. For more details on police cooperation see 24_G_10The Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering in the fight against money laundering and financing of terrorism, upon request and on reciprocal basis continuously exchange information with authorised agencies of other countries and international organisations engaged in the fight against money laundering and fight against financing of terrorism. The Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering in order to strengthen the regional cooperation, have signed bilateral Memorandums of Understanding and Letters on Exchange of Confidential Information with corresponding Institutions for prevention of money laundering of Republic of Croatia; Republic of Slovenia, Republic of Bulgaria, Republic of Serbia, Republic of Albania, Republic of Ukraine and Romania. The coordination on central level in the fight against organised crime is performed by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia. The coordination and monitoring regarding the realisation of the Document on Specific Action – Oriented Measures against Organised Crime in Republic of Macedonia is performed by the Sector for European Integration and with administrative support of the Unit for Justice and Home Affairs.   According to the Law on Organisation and Operation of the State Administrative Bodies (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 58/00 and 44/02), the civil service bodies performing inspection tasks, are obliged to cooperate mutually and to exchange information of mutual interest in execution of inspections of common interest.  For the purpose of more successful fight and suppression of organised crime, the mutual cooperation and exchange of information and data is a legal obligation for all institutions involved in detection of crime and law enforcement. Regarding this, when investigating severe and typical cases of crime, coordinated joint activities aiming at securing material evidence through joint expert working bodies and commissions are carried out.   In the Republic of Macedonia, the cooperation of the law enforcement agencies with the banking sector regarding the prevention of money laundering and financing of terrorism, is carried out through the Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering. The banking sector, as a part of the financial sector, under the provisions of the Law on Prevention of Money Laundering and other Proceeds from Crime has a duty to undertake measures and activities for prevention of money laundering. The cooperation is carried out through specially appointed compliance officers in the banks that are responsible to ensure the implementation of the measures for prevention of money laundering in their banks. The cooperation with the banking sector is also carried out through organising trainings and education for employees of the banks in order to achieve more successful implementation of the measures stipulated by the Law on Prevention of Money Laundering and other Proceeds from Crime. On the basis of mutually signed agreements between the Directorate and the banks, a program for electronic data exchange on basis of public keys is created. The Directorate has a possibility to search the database through which daily information dissemination is performed.   According to the Law, the Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering, upon request and on reciprocal basis, may also deliver data received in execution of its office to organisations and authorised agencies for fight against money laundering of other countries, as well as to international organisations involved in detection and prevention of money laundering and prevention of financing of terrorism. 9. What are the main forms of trafficking (human beings, drugs, cigarettes, firearms, stolen vehicles, etc.) and smuggling? 
In the past years, the trafficking in human beings, drugs, firearms, stolen vehicles and  smuggling in the Republic of Macedonia has significantly increased in terms of number and diversity.  The trafficking in human beings is conducted through several channels of which the most used ones are the following channels: from Moldova, through Romania and Serbia and Montenegro (including Kosovo) to Republic of Macedonia; from Romania, through Bulgaria to Republic of Macedonia and; from Moldova, through Romania to Republic of Macedonia. The Republic of Macedonia, being located in the central part of the Balkan Peninsula, is one of the countries trough which the so called “Balkan Route” for illicit trafficking in narcotic drugs and precursors is passing through.   The first channel – used for heroin transfer covers Republic of Turkey – Republic of Bulgaria - Republic of Macedonia with final destination in Kosovo.   The second channel covers Republic of Turkey – Republic of Bulgaria - Republic of Macedonia with final destination Republic of Albania.  The third channel used for  transfer of narcotic drugs, marihuana and heroin covers Republic of Albania – Republic of Macedonia – Republic of Bulgaria with final destination Republic of Turkey, and   The fourth channel is the one covering Republic of Albania – Republic of Macedonia - Republic of Greece with final destination Republic of Italy. Regarding the drug trafficking, Republic of Macedonia is increasingly becoming a transit point for the heroin and hashish coming from Southwest Asia and it is a minor transit point for the cocaine coming from South America. Namely, Macedonia is a part of one of the branches of the Southern Balkan Route. Heroin originating from Afghanistan and destined for Western European markets crosses Bulgaria, and then passes through Macedonia, where it is further trafficked to the countries of the Former Yugoslavia that are used as gateways for the markets of the EU countries. Some of the heroin that reaches Macedonia is taken to Albania and from there transferred to various European countries. The trafficking in synthetic drugs has also increased in last two years. These cheap drugs, originating from Bulgaria and Serbia are brought to the Macedonian market in small amounts by small vehicles. In Republic of Macedonia, the trafficking in arms, as well as all other abuses of small arms and light weapons are present as a consequence of the 2001 crisis when large quantities of illegal weapons were accumulated in the country. The perpetrators of this type of crime are the participants in the 2001 crisis that have not handed over the weapons despite the Action for voluntary handing over of illegal weapons (carried out from 01.11.2003 to 15.12.2003). Small arms and light weapons of Chinese and Bulgarian origin, as well as weapons produced in the “Zastava” Factory in Serbia and Montenegro are mostly available at the illegal market in the Republic of Macedonia. The largest concentration of illegal weapons and explosives is located in the former crisis regions, being the cause for increased number of crimes with elements of violence (above all murders, armed robberies, kidnappings, etc).  In the last ten years, thefts and trafficking in stolen vehicles have become an increasing problem in the country. As different from the previous period, when the largest number of thefts were committed by juveniles and other perpetrators using the stolen vehicles "for taking a ride” or to commit another crime, starting from 1993, there has been an increase in the number of cases of stolen luxury vehicles where the perpetrators are organised in criminal groups that are very often internationally connected. The inter-connection of the local criminals with foreign ones, mostly from the neighbouring countries is evident. Vehicles stolen in the Republic of Macedonia (the largest percent of them in Skopje) are mostly exported into the neighbouring countries - Republic of Albania and State Union of Serbia and Montenegro, and lately into Kosovo as well. Some of the stolen motor vehicles are sold by theperpetrators to mechanic shops, where the vehicles are disassembled and later sold as spare parts. In the former period, stolen vehicles were smuggled to Republic of Bulgaria too, but that has not been the case in the last years. In the last two or three years, the phenomenon of foreign criminal groups stealing vehicles in the Republic of Macedonia has been registered. Namely, such criminal groups from the Republic of Serbia, familiar with the terrain in the Republic of Macedonia, enter the country and steal vehicles on their own, without help from domestic criminals. Thestolen vehicles are than exported through illegal border crossing points, and through the legal border crossing points using counterfeited documents prepared in advance. Due to the proximity of the border with the neighbours, the stolen motor vehicles are removed out of the Republic of Macedonia in a very short time, in 20-30 minutes. When committing thefts of vehicles, in addition to the classical techniques of breaking the contact locks, criminal groups use sophisticated electronic equipment for the purpose of unblocking the systems of the passenger motor vehicles.  In the context of the international crime with motor vehicles, the Republic of Macedonia is also interesting as a transit area, and for small percentage of stolen motor vehicles as a country of final destination. The stolen vehicles, entering the Macedonian territory at the legal border crossing points with counterfeited documents, are smuggled mostly through the territory of the Republic of Macedonia to their final destination - some of the neighbouring countries.  The smuggling also covers the trafficking in alcohol, cigarettes, oil, as well as other products that in a given period of time have lower prices in the neighbouring countries as compared with their prices in the Republic of Macedonia, and vice versa.  In cases of smuggling of excise and other types of goods, it is necessary to mention that in context of cigarettesmuggling, the Republic of Macedonia is used as a transit area, and the channels for this kind of smuggling include Kosovo, Republic of Macedonia and Republic of Greece. In addition, there is an illegal transfer of legally imported cigarettes in the Republic of Macedonia to Western European countries.  The smuggling of alcoholic beverages in the Republic of Macedonia is realised using the duty free shops on the borders with Republic of Greece and Republic of Bulgaria (on the side of these countries).   With regards to trafficking in textile goods (of Chinese, Turkish and Bulgarian production), the smuggled goods are usually imported from the Republic of Turkey through Republic of Bulgaria to Republic of Macedonia.  Technical goods (mobile telephones, computers, computers parts) are smuggled from the Republic of Greece into the Republic of Macedonia, while foodstuffs are smuggled from the Republic of Bulgaria and the State Union of Serbia and Montenegro into the Republic of Macedonia.  The trafficking in persons, especially women for prostitution purposes, is becoming also a serious problem. Regarding this kind of crime, Republic of Macedonia is mainly a country of origin and transit country. With regards to the transiting, information from NGOs, official sources and interviews with victims suggest that foreign girls are trafficked through the same routes used for drug trafficking. This means that they are brought into Macedonia from Bulgaria and are then trafficked mainly to Albania, from where they are taken to the European prostitution markets.  
10. What are the estimated volumes and value of different categories of illegal trafficking? 
In the last several years, smuggling of excise and other types of goods has acquired characteristics of organised crime, and in most of the cases it is directly connected with the crimes of Corruption, Abuse of official position and authorities,  Use of a document with false contents,  Falsification of document, etc. There are several methods of smuggling excise and other types of goods: smuggling committed with help of customs and police officers enabling illegal entry of goods into the Republic of Macedonia; import of goods by creating fictitious documentation and declaring non-existing companies and; transfer of goods from neighbouring countries into the country across illegal border crossings or in specially concealed compartments in the vehicles.    Starting from 2002 until the end of September 2004, the Ministry of the Interior has detected 549 criminal offences of Smuggling and Illicit trafficking under the provisions of the Criminal Code (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 37/96, 80/99, 4/02 and 19/04), and  the Law on Excise (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 32/01, 50/01,45/02, 98/02 and 24/03), committed by 608 persons. In 2002, 172 criminal offences committed by 189 perpetrators were registered. In 2003, the number registered was 174 criminal offences committed by 197 perpetrators, while in the nine months of 2004 the number was 203 crimes committed by 222 perpetrators. During the previously mentioned period, in the most of the cases, excise goods (cigarettes and alcohol), foodstuffs, technical and textile goods (of Chinese, Turkish and Bulgarian production) have been smuggled. During 2002, the smuggling of alcoholic and non-alcoholic beverages was rather frequent: 19.375 liters of alcohol and 47.910 liters of non-alcoholic beverages were seized. In addition, 15.950 boxes of cigarettes, more than 9 tons of meat and meat products, and more than 6 tons of food products (feta cheese, yellow cheese) were also seized. In 2003 large number of detected cases of smuggling was related to excise goods; 29.868 boxes of cigarettes, more than 21 tones of alcoholic beverages (mostly “Ouzo”), foodstuffs, livestock, etc. were seized.  In the nine months of 2004, 32.7 boxes of cigarettes, 13.034 litres of alcoholic beverages, technical goods (computers and computer parts, mobile telephones), foodstuffs, etc., have been seized as well as medicines, washing powder and various other types of goods.    The Ministry of the Interior, under its competencies for suppression of smuggling of excise and other types of goods, focuses its activities on coordination and cooperation with the Customs Administration and Inspection Services.  The value of seized smuggled goods, represented as the amount of financial damage for the state in 2002, 2003 and the nine months of 2004 totalled 105.035.760 MKD. Of this amount, the value of seized smuggled cigarettes accounted for 46.996.800, of alcohol beverages 13.780.000 MKD, of non-alcoholic beverages 3.000.000 MKD, of foodstuffs 36.229.660 MKD, of technical merchandise 3.338.000 MKD, of seized smuggled textile 1.128.410 MKD, and of other kinds of merchandise 562.890 MKD.  11. Please describe your national legislation on trafficking in human beings (see also questions under Political Criteria). 
Several legal provisions within the legislation of the Republic of Macedonia regulate the issue of trafficking in human beings. In accordance with the latest amendments to the Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” No. 19/04) the crime of trafficking in human beings is regulated by the following Articles: Article 418a, Trafficking in Human Beings; article 418b, Smuggling of Migrants and; article 418c, Organising Group and Conspiring to Perpetrate Crimes of Trafficking in Human Beings and Smuggling of Migrants. The incriminations in Article 418a - Trafficking in Human Beings, are comprised of recruitment, transport, transfer, purchase, selling, harbouring or accepting persons for exploitation by prostitution or other forms of sexual exploitation, pornography, forced labour or servitude, slavery, forced marriages, forced fertilisation, illegal adoption or similar relation, or unlawful transplantation of parts of the human body. If the offence has been perpetrated against children or minors, it is deemed as aggravated criminal offence, for which a stricter penalty is prescribed, i.e., prison sentence of at least eight years. The aforementioned legal provision prescribes sanctions against a person who seizes or destroys a ticket, passport or other person’s identification document and sanctions against a person that uses or enables another person to use sexual services from a person for which he/she knows that he/she is a victim of trafficking in human beings. The provision also foresees responsibility for legal entities and seizure of goods used for perpetration of the crime. Article 418b - Smuggling of Migrants, sanctions the illegal transport of migrants across the state border, obtaining or possession of counterfeited travel document for such purpose, as well as recruitment, transport, transfer, purchase, selling, harbouring or accepting migrants. If in perpetration of these offences, the life or the health of the migrant is threatened, or if the migrant is exposed to especially degrading or cruel treatment, or the migrant is a minor, these offences than represent aggravated criminal offences for which stricter sanctions are envisaged, i.e., imprisonment of at least eight years. Article 418c - Organising Group and Conspiring to Perpetrate Crimes of Trafficking in Human Beings and Smuggling of Migrants, sanctions the organisation and conspiring to perpetrate crimes of trafficking in human beings and smuggling of migrants, and discharges from punishment a member of the group that exposes the group before it commits a crime. The working version of the Draft Law on Aliens foresees provisions, which will be of great importance in the area of offering assistance and protection to victims of trafficking in human beings. The Law on Witness Protection which is also in drafting procedure, will contribute towards enhancement of the national legislation in direction of more efficient fight against trafficking in human beings, as will the Law on Interception of Communications.   12. Does a National Programme on Combating Trafficking in Human Beings exist in your country? If so, please describe the main elements. 
In the area of prevention and fight against trafficking in human beings and illegal migration, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia in 2002 enacted the National Programme for Fight Against Trafficking in Human Beings and Illegal Migration (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” No. 10/02). The National Programme foresees activities to investigate the reasons influencing the trafficking in human beings and illegal migration in the country and the region. Furthermore, it aims to discover the organisers of the criminal activities, their modus operandi and connections with international groups and individuals. Measures for preventive activities and prosecution of the organisers of such crimes on all levels and measures for protection of the victims of such activities are also foreseen.  The National Programme is comprised of:    Legislative activities for the purpose of modernising the national legislation to create a legal basis for more efficient fight against trafficking in human beings. These activities are directed towards changing and amending of the penal legislation of the Republic of Macedonia, introduction of modern investigative techniques for more efficient detection of offences, introduction of witness protection programme, as well as creation of conditions for receiving international legal assistance in cases of criminal prosecution of organised groups with international elements, etc;   Activities for the purpose of creating a strategy for developing and implementing preventive measures for fight against trafficking in human beings such as: pinpointing and reduction of economic and social factors that contribute to women and children becoming victims of trafficking; research projects on issues related to trafficking and migration and; presentation of statistical indicators in this area. In addition, the National Programme forsees activities for discovering of: illegal channels used for transferring persons over the state border; individuals and groups that organise illegal channels through the Republic of Macedonia and neighbouring countries; accomplices and assistants to the organisers of illegal transfer; vehicles and telephone numbers used for their contacts in the Republic of Macedonia; premises used for “temporary” stay and; destinations of the illegally transferred persons;     Assistance and support for the trafficked victims for the purpose of improving the conditions and possibilities for secure and human return of the victims, by rendering protection and assistance to them, i.e., establishing of transit centres where the trafficked victims will be provided with accommodation, alimentation, interpreter, information regarding their rights, social protection and healthcare, and legal assistance;     Return and reintegration of victims for the purpose of providing them with their right to return to their countries of origin; concluding bilateral and multilateral agreements for co-operation in return of the victims; regulating the financing on enforcement of the right to return; establishing cooperation between the shelters and non-governmental organisations and; preparing a programme for their resettlement in third countries;    International cooperation and coordination in law enforcement aimed at creating conditions for international cooperation and coordination in the prosecution of traffickers and protection of women and children subject of trafficking, i.e. concluding extradition agreements; concluding bilateral and multilateral agreements with the countries from and to which the women and children are trafficked, in order to suppress the trafficking and provide for safe return; promotion of co-operation between the public prosecutor’s offices, the police and other relevant services in the countries of South-Eastern Europe; exchanging information between the countries and; planning joint actions to discover international groups;  cooperation with SECI, OSCE mission in the Republic of Macedonia, International Organisation of Migration and other organisations;   Education of personnel, in particular, education of the operational staff in the Ministry of the Interior, education of judicial personnel, prosecution personnel, attorneys, customs officers and social and healthcare workers;   Coordination of activities, i.e. establishing a central computer database, providing a centralised collection and updating of data on trafficking in human beings, their processing, etc;   Raising public awareness regarding the fight against trafficking in human beings through active media coverage of the issue of trafficking in human beings, as well as dissemination of information through video clips, documentary movies, talk shows, newspapers and magazines.   
13. What are the competent authorities for combating trafficking in human beings? 
The National Commission on Fight the Trafficking in Human Beings and Illegal Migration was established with a Decision of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 18/01). The National Commission is comprised of  representatives from the Ministry of the Interior, Ministry of Foreign Affairs,  Ministry of Justice, Ministry of Labour and Social Policy, Ministry of Health, and representatives from the Customs Administration (Ministry of Finance). Within the framework of this Commission in January 2004, a Sub-group for combating child trafficking  was established. The National Programme for Fight against Trafficking in Human Beings and Illegal Migration in the Republic of Macedonia (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 10/02), foresees legislative and preventive activities, assistance and support to the victims of human trafficking, return and reintegration of the victims, international co-operation and coordination in the enforcement of laws, education of personnel, coordination of the activities and raising of the public awareness on the issue of trafficking in human beings.  The legislative activities are carried out by the: Ministry of Justice, Ministry of the Interior, Ministry of Labour and Social Policy, Ministry of Health, Ministry of Foreign Affairs and Ministry of Finance (they are all responsible for creation of the legal framework regarding the sentencing of traffickers and for undertaking preventive activities).   The Ministry of Labor and Social Policy and the Ministry of the Interior are in charge of conducting preventive activities. More specifically the Unit for Gender Equality within the Ministry of Labor and Social Policy undertakes adequate economic and social measures, while the Ministry of the Interior undertakes operational measures and activities in discovering channels for illegal transfer of human beings.  The Ministry of the Interior, Ministry of Labour and Social Policy, Ministry of Health, and Ministry of Justice participate in providing assistance and support to the victims of trafficking in human beings. They are commisioned, within the framework of their competencies, to participate in the organisation of transit centres for sheltering the victims of trafficking in human beings.  The carrier of the process of ensuring the right to return and reintegration of the victims in their countries of origin is the Ministry of the Interior. The following ministries are responsible for international co-operation and coordination of the enforcement of the legal acts: the Ministry of Justice, Ministry of the Interior and Ministry of Foreign Affairs. More precisely they are responsible for conclusion of bilateral and multilateral agreements with the countries from and to which the persons are trafficked; for promotion of communication and cooperation between the public prosecutors offices and the police in the countries of South-Eastern Europe; for efficient prosecution and closure of channels for trafficking in human beings; exchanging data on criminal groups and individuals with other countries; cooperation with competent governmental and non-governmental organisations and etc. The establishing of the Transit Centre for Aliens, in March 2001, has a great significance for the issue of assistance and protection of victims of trafficking. The Transit Centre provides accommodation for the victims of trafficking until their repatriation, as well as necessary documentation for return to their countries of origin. The victims in the Centre are provided with 24-hour police guard, psychological and health care, and legal assistance provided by the International Organisation of Migrations and some non-governmental organisations.  In order to achieve better control over the employment in commercial catering facilities, in 2002 within the Ministry of the Interior, a Commission for decision-making regarding the requests for consent for employment as dancers in Night Clubs was established. With this, a better control is ensured on the employment of foreign nationals as dancers, waiters, etc in the commercial catering facilities.  14. Do your law enforcement agencies receive specific training on combating trafficking in human beings? Please describe. 
In the framework of the National Programme for Fight Against Trafficking in Human Beings and Illegal Migration (Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 18/01) appropriate education and training is forseen for the operational staff of the Ministry of the Interior and members of other state bodies whose work scope include the area of fight against trafficking in human beings.  According to this Programme, the following specific activities are foreseen:    Education of operational staff in the Ministry of the Interior that is directly in charge of police investigations in cases of trafficking in human beings;    Education of judicial and prosecution personnel and personnel in the penitentiary institutions; and    Education of customs officers regarding their active involvement in the fight against trafficking in human beings .   For efficient realisation of the education, the National Program will be carried out through:   Specialised seminars with national and international experts in order to upgrade the cooperation on national and international level, and    Participation on international, regional and local expert seminars.  In the context of the aforementioned, the students enrolled at the Police Academy, within the subject of Criminology in the third year of the studies, during one semester are provided with studies on the phenomenon of  trafficking in human beings. Furthermore, within the courses organised by the Police Academy, modules comprised of topics regarding the fight against organised crime are being realised (commercial crime, trafficking in human beings, drugs, weapons, and excise goods).  Within the basic police training, the topic of trafficking in human beings  is  covered by 20 classes, and afterwards final exams have to be passed.  A Letter on Cooperation between the Ministry of Interior, OSCE and IOM (International organisation for Migration) for training in the field of fight against trafficking in human beings was signed in October, 2003. A total of 650 personnel from all levels of the current police personnel and the newly established Border Police participated in this training. The training was conducted by national and international experts on the basis of adapted material from the Stability Pact for SEE and UNDP, which provide for complete implementation of these projects.  The representatives of the Ministry of the Interior, Public Prosecutor’s Office, Judiciary and non-governmental organisations in the Republic of Macedonia actively participated in the preparation of the Regional Manuals. This activity is organised by UNDP, the Stability Pact for SEE, and the ICPMD as an implementation agency. Under the auspices of the Stability Pact for SEE, the South Eastern Europe countries have prepared Regional Manual on training of police officers from lower ranks and recruits. The Regional Manual for training of police officers of higher rank is prepared by UNDP. The Manuals on training of judges and prosecutors are also prepared under the auspices of the Stability Pact for SEE. The educators from the Ministry of the Interior, Public Prosecutor’s Office, Judiciary, Ministry of Finance – Customs Administration and representatives of non-governmental organisations have been educated as well. They proceed with implementation of the Manuals through training of police officers, judges, prosecutors and expert assistants in the Courts and in the Public Prosecutor’s Office.  At present, the realisation of the project “REFLEX”, aimed at training of personnel for preventing illegal transit, smuggling and trafficking in human beings in the field of intelligence and operational analysis, is ongoing. The project is conducted under the auspices of the Government of the United Kingdom.  In the framework of the project “REFLEX”, the British model for data analysis, including the phases of the analytical cycles, the techniques of data cross-referencing, and the need to apply unified methods in evaluation of the resources and information when submitting operational reports, were presented at a course on intelligence held in the United Kingdom, in February, 2004. The principles of the analytical model were presented, as well as the method of data  cross-referencing, and the need for their tabulation. The role of the analyst, the difference between tactical and strategic analytics, tactical and strategic analyst, tactical and strategic estimation, tactical and strategic decision-making have also been described. Within the framework of the project “REFLEX”, the duties and the method of work of the undercover police officer, their records, and grounds for commitment and data collection were also presented.   During 2004, the Agencies of the Justice Department within the United States Embassy, through the International Program on Assistance and Training in Criminal Investigations (ICITAP) and the Program for Assistance, Development and Training of the Prosecutors (OPDAT), and in cooperation with OSCE mission in the Republic of Macedonia, have organised three workshops on ”trafficking in human beings“. Within the framework of the project Counter Trafficking, Technical cooperation/capacity – building, supported by the Government of the Kingdom of Norway, during June and July 2004, the IOM has organised three subsequent trainings on topic “Trafficking in human beings and illegal migration“ intended for education of lawyers, representatives from the Police and Public Prosecutor’s Office and judges. Under the auspices of the SECI Regional Centre for combating trans-border crime, a course on special investigative techniques and interrogation in cases of trafficking in human beings was carried out in Bucharest-Romania, in May 2004. Public Prosecutor's Office One of the key institutions competent for combating organised crime and trafficking in human beings, is the Public Prosecutor's Office.   In this respect, several trainings on issues related to crimes in the field of trafficking in human beings, as most visible segment in the area of organised crime were organised in the past period. This activity has resulted in preparing a Manual on Operation, earmarked for judges and public prosecutors, and preparation of  Practice Book on special practical aspects of this type of crime is currently underway. Many seminars on topics related to corruption and money laundering and trafficking in human beings, where a large number of public prosecutors participated, have been also organised.   The Centre for Continuing Education carries out the training of the judges in the Republic of Macedonia. The educational activities organised by the Centre for Continuing Education in the field of organised crime are presented in the following tables:  2004  O.n.  Topic Beginning End Day Total participants Total judges Total expert assistance Total Prosecutor
Total guests 1. Organised crime  11.3.2004 13.3.2004 2. Tax crime 17.3.2004  18.3.2004  2 3. Tax crime 18.3.2004 19.3.2004 2  10 10  / /  / 4. Trafficking in human beings  1.4.2004 3.4.2004 12 12 5. Trafficking in human beings  24.6.2004 26.6.2004 27 12 6. Trafficking in human beings  8.7.2004 10.7.2004 30 15 
2003  O.n. Topic Beginning End Hour Tot. participants Tot. judges Tot. expert assistance Tot. Prosecutor
Tot. guests 1. 8. Trafficking in human beings 09.05.2003  10.05.2003 8,5 64 30 18 15 2. 10. Trafficking in human beings 06.06.2003  07.06.2003 80 45 17 18 3. 15. Trafficking in human beings - implementation of the Regional Manual for judges and Public Prosecutors 15.10.2003 18.10.2003 17 17 10  2 4. 16. Fight against organised crime, active and passive corruption and money laundering 20.10.2003 24.10.2003  24,5 38 5. 17. Trafficking in human beings - implementation of the Regional Manual for judges and Public Prosecutors 29.10.2003 01.11.2003  16,5 26 17 
2002  Nr. Topic Beginning End Day Tot. participants 1. Trafficking in human beings 3.10.2002 3.10.2002 2. Trafficking in human beings 24.10.2002 26.10.2002 3. Trafficking in human beings 28.10.2002 30.10.2002 4. Money laundering 11.12.2002 13.12.2002 3  7 Source: Centre for Continuing Education of Judges Customs administration  In the area of the fight against organised crime and trafficking in human beings,  Custom Administration of the Republic of Macedonia, has special competencies, as well. Customs Administration, as a state administration authority competent for law enforcement, carries out this competence through the Sector for Control and Investigations. For the purpose of more efficient dealing with all new forms of organised crime and joint action with other state institutions, in particular with the Public Prosecutor’s Office and the judiciary, joint trainings in the country and abroad have been conducted. Thus, 12 Customs Officers from the Customs Administration of the Republic of Macedonia participated in trainings regarding the issues of money laundering, criminal offences related to corruption, abuse of official position, trans-national organised crime, trafficking in human beings, financing of terrorism, tax evasion, smuggling etc. Apart from the employees of the Customs Administration, the representatives from the Public Prosecutor’s Office and the judiciary participated at these trainings as well. The primary goal of these trainings is networking of such institutions for the purposes of joint operation, coordination and successful enforcement of the fight against aforementioned types of organised crime.       15. Do your law enforcement agencies include specific units for combating trafficking (human beings, drugs, cigarettes, firearms, stolen vehicles etc.)? 
Within the Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Macedonia, the detection and prevention of crimes of trafficking in human beings, drugs, fire arms, cigarettes, stolen vehicles and etc. according to the Strategy for Police Reforms and the adopted Action Plan of January 2005 are placed within the scope of work of the Department for Organised Crime comprised of 7 Sectors and 3 Sections.   The Sector for Financial Crime is comprised of:    Section for Economic Crime,    Section for Money Laundering and Corruption and    Section for Computer Crime and Forgeries.   The Sector for Illicit Drug Trafficking is comprised of:   Section for Illicit Trafficking in Opiats, Cocaine and Cannabis and    Section for Illicit Trafficking in Synthetic Drugs, Psychotropic Substances and Precursors. The Sector for Violent Crime is comprised of:    Section for Trafficking in Human Beings and other violent crime,    Homicide Section and    Section for Property Offences.    The Sector for Trafficking in Weapons and Hazardous Substances is comprised of:   Section for Illicit Trafficking in Weapons, and    Section for Illicit Trafficking in Chemical, Biological, Radioactive and nuclear substances. The Sector for Criminal and Intelligence Analysis is comprised of:   Section for Criminal and Intelligence Analysis,    Intelligence Section and    Section for Logistics and Administration. The Sector for International Police Cooperation is comprised of:    Section for National Central Bureau – INTERPOL – Skopje and    Section for Technical Support and Administration. The Sector for Special Investigative Techniques is comprised of:    Section for “Undercover” Operations,    Section for Operative Surveillance and Documenting and    Section for Electronic Surveillance and Documenting. Besides these Sectors, within the Department for Organised Crime three more autonomous Sections are established: Section for Witness Protection, Section for Searches and Unit for Work Quality Control. Within the Ministry of Finance – Customs Administration of the Republic of Macedonia, a Sector for Control and Investigations is operating. The primary goal of this Sector is the fight against organised crime, especially suppression of illicit trafficking with high-risk commodities, narcotic drugs, weapons, cigarettes, human beings, etc.  Within the Sector for Control and Investigations, the following Sections operate:  Intelligence Unit,  Investigations Unit,   Mobile Teams Unit,   Control and Audit Unit,    Risk analysis Unit   Analytical and Statistical Unit, and     Duty Operational Centre. The Sector for Control and Investigations works on detection and prevention of customs offences and criminal offences, and performs  control and inspection activities.  Within the Sector there are no separate Sections and Units specialised in the suppression of above-mentioned forms of illegal trafficking, i.e. all the Sections and Units within the Sector are coordinated in the enforcement of the activities on suppression of illicit trafficking in drugs, weapons, people, cigarettes, etc. 16. Is there - based on a multi-disciplinary approach - any form of cooperation between the competent law enforcement agencies and other agencies, which are involved in the prevention of and the fight against trafficking in human beings? 
In 2001, in the context of prevention and combating trafficking in human beings, a National Commission on Fight Against Illicit Trafficking in Human Beings and Illegal Migration (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 18/01) was established. The Committee is comprised of representatives of the Ministry of the Interior, Ministry of Foreign Affairs, Ministry of Justice, Ministry of Labour and Social Policy, Ministry of Health and Ministry of Finance – Customs Administration. In 2002, the National Programme for Fight Against Trafficking in Human Beings  and Illegal Migration in the Republic of Macedonia was adopted ,(“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” No. 10/2002) based on multi-disciplinary and multi-dimensional approach, using the experiences from practice thus far, experiences from other countries, cooperation with and membership in international initiatives, as well as cooperation with various international and domestic non-governmental organisations and associations which deal with issues of trafficking in human beings and illegal migration. In order to establish an appropriate way of cooperation and constructive approach in the joint activities of the national authorities, international organisations and non-governmental sector in the area of combating the trafficking of human beings and illegal migration in the Republic of Macedonia, at its session on 16.07.2003, the National Commission adopted a decision to establish a Secretariat of the National Commission. The Secretariat of the National Commission is comprised of representatives of the organisational units of the Ministry of the Interior, international organisations - IOM, OSCE, ICMPD, UNICEF, UNDP, USAID, ICITAP and OPDAT and Macedonian non-governmental organisations “Happy Childhood” and “Open Gate” (La Strada – Macedonia). It is a body of technical and logistical nature, having a coordination function in the process of implementation of the National Programme for Fight against Illicit Trafficking in Human Beings and Illegal Migration in the Republic of Macedonia. The National Commission, as a coordination body, monitors and analyses the situation in the area of trafficking in human beings and illegal migration and at its working meetings presents programme activities, the purpose of which is to adopt strategic decisions. The Secretariat of the National Commission is in charge of implementing the priority activities; coordination of projects with international organisations arranged by the in-line Ministries; preparation of materials regarding issues on the agenda of the National Commission sessions; establishing of cooperation and exchange of experiences with other countries and; organisation of training seminars.  According to the National Programme, most of the foreseen activities are within the competencies of the Ministry of the Interior i.e. within the competencies of the organisational units of this Ministry dealing with the fight against trafficking in human beings and smuggling of migrants and illegal migration. Until January 2005, the Sector for Organised Crime – Section for Fight against Trafficking in Human Beings, Property Offences with Elements of Coercion, Forgeries and Gambling, which is within the Criminal Police Department, was in charge of detection, documenting and processing of criminal offences in this area. Along with the newly established Department for Organised Crime, the Section for Trafficking in Human Beings and Other Violent Crime functions within the new Sector for Violent Crime. The authorised officials, in performing their tasks, gather operative information or receive information through non-governmental organisations, IOM and 24hour lines for persons victims of trafficking in human beings. The persons are interviewed and if established that the person is a victim of trafficking in human beings, assistance and aid are immediately provided; namely the person is placed in the Transit Centre for Aliens, which is a part of the Ministry of the Interior. The counterpart organisation for cooperation in this respect is the International Organisation for Migration. At this Centre, the victims are provided 24hour police security, psychological, medical and legal assistance. The assistance is provided by domestic non-governmental organisations that are permanently present in the Transit Centre. The victims are accommodated in the Centre on a voluntary basis and this accomodation is not conditioned by requirement that they should be witnesses in a procedure taking place before competent courts or of any operational help for the law enforcement agencies. The identification of victims is performed by the representatives of the Ministry of the Interior, International Organisation for Migration and non-governmental organisations. There are agreed standard operational procedures for processing of victims in the Transit Centre. These procedures help to define the relations between the Ministry of the Interior, the International Organisation for Migration and the non-governmental organisations involved in the work of the Centre. If it is determined that the victim of trafficking in human beings is a minor, the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy –Social Care Centre appoints a legal guardian who has the role of supporting the minor in all aspects. At the same time, through the Ministry of Foreign Affairs, the diplomatic or consular mission of the country of origin of the victim of trafficking in human beings is informed. The repatriation of the victims of trafficking in human beings is performed by the Ministry of the Interior and the International Organisation for Migration. The Ministry of the Interior, based on the secured evidence, submits a proposal for instigating criminal charges against the perpetrators of these criminal offences. This proposal is submitted to the competent Basic Public Prosecutor that further processes the offence before the competent courts. In January 2004, within the National Commission on Fight against Trafficking in Human Beings and Illegal Migration, a Sub-group for Fight against Trafficking in Children was established. This Sub-Group is composed of representatives of the Ministry of the Interior, non-governmental organisations, OSCE – Spillover Mission in Skopje, Ministry of Labour and Social Policy, Ministry of Education and Science, Deputy Ombudsman for Protection of Children’s Rights and representative from the International Organisation for Migration. The Sub-Group will design adapted guidelines on protection of rights of children – victims of trafficking in human beings. The Guidelines will establish standards of treatment and special measures for protection of and support to children – victims of trafficking in the Republic of Macedonia. This protection will be performed from the initial identification all the way to full integration and recovery of the child. The Guidelines are based on the standards of the UNICEF guide for protection of rights of children – victims of trafficking in South-Eastern Europe and is adjusted to and harmonised with the national legislation.  In addition to this, the Draft National Action Plan for Fight Against Trafficking in Children is being prepared. The National Action Plan is a document aiming at establishing comprehensive multidisciplinary scheme of measures for combating trafficking in children, prevention of trafficking in children, protection of the children – victims of trafficking in human beings and criminal prosecution of children traffickers.  The Republic of Macedonia is the first country in the SEE region that, on its own initiative, organised an arrival of witnesses – victims of trafficking in human beings, who have already been repatriated to their countries of origin. The arrival of witnesses – victims of trafficking in human beings, is a result of the cooperation of the judicial bodies, Public Prosecutor’s Office and Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Macedonia with the Ministries of Internal Affairs of Ukraine, Romania, Moldova and Bulgaria and the SECI Regional Centre in Bucharest for combating transborder crime and the International Organisation for Migration.  17. Please explain the main difficulties that you face in combating money laundering (see also Chapter 4 – free movement of capital). 
The prevention of money laundering in the Republic of Macedonia is regulated for the first time with the Law on Money Laundering Prevention (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 70/01). ThisLaw stipulated the measures and actions that should be undertaken by the subjects concerned with detection and prevention of this criminal offence. In addition, the provisions of this Law envisaged the formation of Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering (as a Financial Intelligence Unit-FIU) as a body responsible for collection, processing, analysis, delivery and keeping of data received from concerned subjects. Thus far, the Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering was facing several problems primarily related to lack of knowledge and experience in this area, insufficient technical and human resources and weaknesses in the Law on Money Laundering Prevention (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 70/01). These problems are gradually overcame and a significant progress, mostly related to completion of the teams in the Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering(increasing the number of employees from 4 to 8) is noted. In addition, the training of the employees is intensifyed, the regional cooperation broadened and strengthened, a membership in EGMONT obtained and the new Law on Prevention of Money Laundering and Other Proceeds from Crime (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No.46/04) adopted. Similarly, with regards to the investigation and prosecution of the perpetrators of the crime of money laundering, the law enforcement agencies (the Ministry of the Interior, the Financial Police and the Public Prosecutor’s Office) were facing problems in proving the predicated crime due to difficulties in establishing the illegal origin of the property, as well as impossibility for applying special investigative techniques and methods during the police investigation. The latest amendments on the Law on Criminal Procedure from October, 2004 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 15/97, 44/02 and 74/04), stipulate application of special investigation measures that will contribute in providing data and evidence necessary for successful conduct of the criminal procedure.  18. Please describe the structures in place for combating money laundering (incl. within the police, prosecutor’s office and judiciary). Have you established a properly functioning Financial Intelligence Unit? Describe any co-operation with the banking system. 
The existing structure for repression of money laundering in the Republic of Macedonia is comprised of the following bodies:   Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering (as a Financial Intelligence Unit-FIU);   Financial Police;    Ministry of the Interior;   Public Prosecutor’s Office;  Courts;   other bodies such as Customs Administration, Public Revenue Office, etc. Within the Ministry of Finance a Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering is established. The Directorate, as a Financial Intelligence Unit (FIU) of administrative type, is a body without investigation competences which, according to the Law on Prevention of Money Laundering and other Proceeds from Crime (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No., 46/2004) which succeeded the Law on Money Laundering Prevention, is competent for gathering, processing, analysis, maintenance and distribution of data received from entities under legal obligation to undertake measures and activities for detection and suppression of money laundering. If the analysis of the received reports results in suspicion of money laundering, the Directorate prepares a written report to competent state bodies (Public Prosecutor’s Office, the Ministry of the Interior and the Financial Police). Hence, it can be concluded that the Directorate is an intermediary between the financial and other private sector (entities under legal obligation) on one hand and the police and the justice system bodies, on the other hand.  In that context, the cooperation of the law enforcement agencies with the private and the banking sector in relation to prevention of money laundering and financing of terrorism in the Republic of Macedonia is realised precisely through the Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering. The banking sector, as a part of the financial sector, has the obligation under the Law on Prevention of Laundering of Money and other Proceeds of Crime to undertake measures and activities for prevention of money laundering whereby the cooperation with the Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering is conducted through specially appointed contact persons (compliance officers), responsible for enforcement of the programmes for implementation of measures for prevention of money laundering within their bank. Besides the reports on the transactions, which the banks have duty to submit to the Directorate according to the Law, the banks also submit data and information upon a request from the Directorate.  More specifically, for the purposes of prevention of money laundering and financing of terrorism, the banks have the following obligations: Identification of clients:   In cases of one or several connected transactions (regardless of whether they are cash or non-cash) in the amount of 15.000 EUR in MKD equivalent or more;   When establishing a business or contractual relationship;   Before opening an account or savings account, receipt of keeping shares, bonds or other securities, rental of safety deposit boxes, asset management or effectuating or receipt of payment on behalf of a third person;   In the course of currency exchange operations, before every transaction in the amount of 2.500 EUR in MKD equivalent or more;   When providing services of swift money transfer, before every transaction in the amount  of 2.500 EUR in MKD equivalent or more; Identification of authorised persons:   Special monitoring and transactions tracking for which suspicion exist that they are linked to money laundering or financing of terrorism;   Collecting and keeping data on the transactions and clients who perform them; Communication of data to the Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering on:   Cash transactions in the amount of 15.000 EUR or more, connected financial transactions that cumulatively reach the amount of 15.000 EUR or more (within three business days);   Transactions (irrespective of the amount and irrespective of the type – cash or non-cash, if there is suspicion that it represents money laundering (not later than within 24 hours); Introduction of internal programmes for implementation of measures for prevention of money laundering that foresee:   Centralisation of the data on identity of clients, holders of rights, consignees, authorised representatives and consignors, as well as the data on suspicious transactions;   Appointment of responsible persons in charge of the implementation of the programme at managerial level, as well as in any organisational part;   Plan on continuous training of responsible officers and other employees;   Instruments for internal review of the implementation of the measures and activities;   Cooperation with the Directorate. In addition to the established measures and actions for detection and prevention of money laundering, the banks have a duty to submit additional data and information upon request of the Directorate, in respect of transactions it analyses in more details. On the other hand, the Directorate participates in the professional improvement of the responsible persons in the banks, and establishes lists of indicators for recognition of suspicious transactions in cooperation with the banks and agencies supervising their operation. Furthermore, the cooperation with the banking sector is also related to organisation of training and education for employees in the banks in order to improve their work in implementing the measures prescribed by the Law on Prevention of Money Laundering and Other Proceeds of Crime. Furthermore, the Directorate according to the Law on Criminal Procedure and the Law on Prevention of Money Laundering and Other Proceeds from Crime, has the obligation to inform the Public Prosecutor’s Office about proceeds or property, learned of in any way, while performing tasks under its competencies, if there is reasonable suspicion that they have been acquired through organised crime. The banks and other legal entities have a duty, according to the Law, upon a request from the Public Prosecutor’s Office to immediately submit data on balance of accounts for which there is a reasonable suspicion that they are used to exploit or conceal the sources of money laundering.  The Directorate, according to the Law, can communicate the data it receives in the course of its operation, upon their request and under conditions of reciprocity, to authorised agencies and organisations for fight against money laundering of other countries, as well as international organisations that deal with detection, prevention and suppression of money laundering and prevention of financing of terrorism.  For more details on the existing structure of the Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering see answer 04_III_02.  The Financial Police, as a law enforcement agency, is a body within the Ministry of Finance, established with the Law on Financial Police (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 55/02) in June 2003. According to the Law, the Financial Police is an operative body of the state administration in charge of criminal prosecution, i.e., detection of offenders involved in activities related to the most complex forms of financial crime, tax fraud, money laundering and other types of crimes which involve non-payment of greater and significant amounts of excises, taxes, customs duties or represent legalisation of proceeds from crime. The competencies of the Financial Police are at the moment, performed by 10 financial police officers organised in two departments: Department for Information Gathering and Case Building, and Department for Police Investigations. Under the aegis of the cooperation among the Customs Administration, Public Revenue Office, Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering and other competent bodies, currently there is a procedure for signing protocols for cooperation and exchange of data. The cooperation and exchange of data will take place through liaison officers (responsible officers employed in these institutions) that will provide greater security and confidentiality of data. In the Ministry of the Interior, i.e. within the newly established Department for Organised Crime, a competent body for suppression of money laundering is the Sector for Financial Crime where a separate Section for Money Laundering and Corruption is established. The Section for Money Laundering and Corruption employs 8 inspectors – experts on issues related to money laundering. At regional level, issues related to money laundering are dealt by organisational units for repression of economic crime in the Sectors and Departments of Internal Affairs. The aforementioned activities and tasks are covered by an optimal number of officers with relevant university education and completed specialist courses and seminars on economic crime, with a special emphasis on topics in the area of money laundering. Pursuant to Article 29 from the Law on Public Prosecutor’s Office (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 38/04), at the Public Prosecutor’s Office of the Republic of Macedonia, the Unit for Fight against Organised Crime and Corruption is established as a separate organisational unit. The competencies of this Unit practically cover money laundering as a form of organised crime. The Unit, within its scope of work, is competent to act before the basic courts on the entire territory of the Republic of Macedonia, and in accordance with the provisions of the Law on Criminal Procedure and the Law on Public Prosecutor’s Office. In performing of its functions of detection and prosecution, it cooperates with competent state bodies, primarily with the Ministry of the Interior, Customs Administration, Public Revenue Office, Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering, and with the National Bank.  According to the Law on Courts (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 36/95, 45/95 and 64/03), the courts have general competence and they are organised in three instances: first instance, appellate courts and the Supreme Court. In the Republic of Macedonia, there are no specialised courts. In the document Specific Action – Oriented Measures against Organised Crime in Republic of Macedonia adopted on 10.11.2003 by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, the courts are referred under the Priority 4 that foresees specialised training of judges in the area of fight against organised crime enhancing the capacity of the judiciary for fight against organised crime. With a decision of the presidents of first instance courts, in five courts judges are appointed to work on cases of organised crime, including money laundering. In addition there is an ongoing specialisation and training of the selected judges in the area of fight against organised crime. The Strategy for reform of the judiciary foresees strengthening of the professional relations with the Unit for Fight against Organised Crime and Corruption, as well as with other institutions in the Republic of Macedonia working in this area. 19. What obligations are placed on financial institutions to prevent money laundering? Are financial institutions required to report suspicions of money laundering? 
With an aim to prevent money laundering and financing of terrorism, the financial institutions (and other non-financial institutions determined by the Law on Prebention of Money Laundering and Other Proceeds from Crime (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 46/04) have the following duties: Identification of the clients:    In cases when there are several chain transactions (irrespective whether they are cash or non-cash transactions) in amount of 15.000 EUR in MKD equivalent or more (Article 22);   While establishing business or contractual relation (Article 7, paragraph 1);    Prior to opening an account or saving-book, receipt of keeping shares, bonds or other types of securities, provision for usage of the safe-deposit boxes, asset management, or effectuating or receipt of payment on behalf of a third party (Article 7, paragraph 2);    In cases of life insurance, when the individual or several instalments of the premium that have to be paid within a period of one year exceed the amount of 1.000 EUR in MKD equivalent, or when the sole premium exceed the amount of 2.500 EUR in MKD equivalent (Article 7, paragraph 3);   Immediately after entering a casino (Article 19) ;    In cases of money exchange, before any transaction in the amount of 2.500 EUR in MKD equivalent, or more   (Article 17);    In cases of providing services of swift money transfer, before any transaction in amount of 2.500  EUR in MKD equivalent, or more (Article 18); Identification of the authorisers (Article 10)    Special monitoring of certain transactions where suspicions exist that these transactions are connected with money laundering or financing of terrorism (Article 15);    Collecting and keeping data on transactions and clients performing them (Article 20); Data delivery to the Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering:    Cash transactions in the amount of 15.000 EUR or several, chain cash transactions that together reach the amount of 15.000 EUR or more (within three working days) -Article 22, paragraph 1, point b) and c);   Transactions (irrespective of the amount and irrespective of the type – cash or non-cash transactions) if there is suspicion of money laundering (not latter than within 24 hours) – Article 22, paragraph 1, point a) ; Introduction of internal programs for implementation of measures for protection against money laundering, which provide for (Article 33):    Centralisation of data regarding the client’s identity, the holders of rights, proxies, authorised representatives and authorisers, as well as of data about suspicious transactions; Appointment of responsible persons in the financial institutions in charge of program implementation on central managerial level and in each organisational part;    Planing of training of responsible persons and other employees;     Instruments for internal review of the implementation of measures and actions;     Cooperation with the Directorate. In accordance with Article 22, paragraph 1, point a) and Article 15, paragraph 2 of the Law on Prevention of Money Laundering and Other Proceeds from Crime (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 46/04), the financial institutions have a duty to submit reports in cases of suspicion of money laundering and financing of terrorism. In these cases, the financial institutions are obliged, apart from determining the identity of the client, to request information about the course of the whole transaction including the final destination of the money, as well as the purpose of the transaction and the identity of the involved parties. On the basis of these data, the financial institutions shall prepare and submit written report to the Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering within 24 hours from the receipt of the information about the suspicious transaction. In cases when the client or the authoriser refuse to identify himself, the financial institutions have a duty to refuse the business relation or the performance of the transaction, and if the transaction is in progress, to withhold it and to submit a written report to the Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering, presenting the data that they have. When identifying the transactions considered as suspicious, the financial institutions, beside their own experience, apply the indicators for recognising suspicious transactions as well. 20. How many money-laundering cases have been prosecuted and brought to a successful conclusion? 

Year criminal charges investigations  prosecution acts  verdicts 1997 1 1 0 0 1998 0 0 0 0 1999 1 1 0 0 2000 0 0 0 0 2001 0 0 0 0 2002 0 0 0 0 2003 0 0 0 0 2004 1 1 0 0 total 3 3 0 0 Source: Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering  Thus far, in the Republic of Macedonia, successfully proceeded cases for money-laundering are not registered. 
21. How have you responded to requests for mutual legal assistance related to money laundering? 
With regards to mutual legal assistance, the Ministry of Justice acts according to the provisions of the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 15/97, 44/02 and 74/04), which foresees that international legal assistance in criminal law cases shall be carried out in conformity with the provisions of this Law, unless otherwise regulated with international agreements and treaties. The Requesting State delivers the request for international legal assistance to the Ministry of Justice; afterwards the Ministry of Justice, regardless of the type of crime, and depending on the stage of the procedure, forwards the request to the Public Prosecutor’s Office or to the court. The reply is delivered back by the same channels, i.e. the court or the Public Prosecutor’s Office forwards the reply to the Ministry of Justice, and the Ministry forwards the answer to the body which has requested legal assistance.     Thus far, the Ministry of Justice has not received an application i.e. request for legal assistance in cases of money laundering. 
Protection of the financial interests of the European Communities (“third pillar” aspects)  
1. Does national law criminalise fraud against the Communities’ financial interests, covering both expenditure and revenue? 
The Law Amending  the Criminal Code (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 19/04) introduces efficient measures for the suppression of new forms of crime, harmonising the national legislation with the EU acquis communautaire.  In order to protect the property, economic order and relations in the country, the Law Amending the Criminal Code  criminalises the offences against property (Chapter XXIII), offences against public finances, payment operations and economy (Chapter XXV) and offences against official duty (Chapter XXX).   The crime of fraud against the European Communities’ financial interests is criminalised and according to its form may be classified under the following penal provisions:
The Chapter XXIII from the Criminal Code criminalises the criminal offence of Fraud (Article 247) and Evasion (Article 239).
The Chapter XXV from the Code criminalise the crimes of Fraud in the operations with securities (Article 275), the Tax evasion (Article 279), and the crime of Abuse of authorisation in the economy (Article 287)   Chapter XXX criminalises the following acts: Abuse of official position and authorisation (Article 353), Embezzlement in service (Article 354), Fraud in service (Article 355), Malfeasance in the service (Article 353b).  The criminal offence of fraud is committed with intention of acquiring unlawful property gained by misrepresentation or by concealing facts with a purpose to bring or keep another person under deception and herewith induce him to do or to refrain from doing something to the detriment of one's own or another person’s property. A perpetrator of this criminal offence may be any person. The crime of Fraud in operations with securities (Article 275) is committed when the financial situation of the legal entity that releases securities and shares in circulation is falsely presented with an aim to induce one or more persons to buy or sell these shares or other securities. The criminal offence of Abuse of authorisation in the economy (Article 278) consists of acquiring unlawful property gain for a legal entity by creating or keeping illicit funds in the country or abroad, or by deceiving the legal entity’s administrative bodies about the condition of the legal entity in relation to their decision making. The deceiving of the administrative bodies in the legal entity may be performed by composing a document with false contents, with a false financial statement, evaluation or inventory, or with some other false presentation or by concealing facts. A perpetrator of these crimes may be any person, but stemming from the letter of the law, only the responsible person in the legal entity with a scope of activity and competencies in the administration and in handling the property and entrusted assets may be the perpetrator.  The abuse of authorisation in the economy is a special form of the crime of Abuse of official position and authorisation (Article 353). The criminal offences against official duty (Abuse of official position and authorisation, Embezzlement in the service, Fraud in the service) are crimes that are committed within the performance of official duty and public competencies by an official. These crimes are primarily directed towards violation of the professional duty, but also towards violation of some other goods, such as property. These crimes may be committed by abuse of the official position or by exceeding the public competencies. The perpetrator of these crimes may be an official or responsible person within the legal entity, as well as any other official person, that works in the bodies listed in Article 122, paragraph 6 of the Law Amending the Criminal Code.  Aimed at strengthening the preventive measures for protection from unlawful usurpation of State property, Budget funds and resources from public funds in performing of public authorisations, the new criminal offence of Malfeasance in the service (Article 353b) criminalises dishonest disposal with entrusted property.  The national criminal legislation is applicable to citizens of the Republic of Macedonia when they commit some crime abroad, if they are on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia or are extradited. The national criminal legislation is applicable also to foreigners that commit crimes outside Republic of Macedonia but directed against the Republic of Macedonia or against its citizen, in cases when they are on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia or are extradited. The provisions from the Criminal Code are also applicable to foreigners that in a foreign country commit a crime against the foreign country or against  foreigners, sanctioned according to foreign countries’ legislation with five years of imprisonment or a more severe punishment, in a case when they are on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia and when they are not extradited to the foreign country. Accordingly, it can be concluded that our national legislation criminalises fraud, as well as other criminal offences if they are committed against the Communities’ financial interests, covering both expenditure and revenue.  2. Is both active and passive corruption, also involving officials of the European Communities and officials of the Member States, criminalised? 
Pursuant to Article 357 and 358 of the Criminal Code (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 37/96, 80/99, 4/02, 43/03 and 19/04), in the Republic of Macedonia the criminal offences of receiving and giving a bribe  are  sanctioned. A significant novelty in these articles is the distinction made between official and responsible person and the possibility for the person giving a bribe upon a request from an official person, to be exempt from prosecution if he/she has reported the offence before it was discovered. The last paragraphs of the aforementioned Articles stipulated that active and passive corruption is considered as criminal offence for foreign legal entities and foreign officials, as well. Receiving a bribe An official person requesting or receiving a present or some other material benefit, or receiving a promise for a present or some other material benefit, in order to perform an official act within the framework of his/her official authorisation which he/she should not perform, or to refrain from performing an official act he/she otherwise must perform, shall be punished with imprisonment between one and ten years.   An official person requesting or receiving a present or some other material benefit, or receiving a promise for a present or some other material benefit, in order to perform an official act within the framework of his/her official authorisation which he/she must perform, or to refrain from performing an official act he/she otherwise should not perform, shall be punished with imprisonment between six months and five years. An official person who, after performing or not performing the mentioned official acts, requests or receives a present or some other material benefit, shall be punished with imprisonment between three months and three years.   With the same penalties a responsible person and person that performs duties of public interest shall be punished  as well, if the offence is done in relation to acquiring, enforcement or removal of rights established by law, or in order to  profit or cause a damage to another person. The same applies to a responsible person from a foreign legal entity, as well as a foreign official person that commits the offence in order to cause damage to the Republic of Macedonia, its citizens or any legal entity.  The received present or acquired property gains shall be confiscated. Giving a bribe The person who gives or promises a present or other material benefit to an official person so that he/she performs an official act within the framework of his/her official competencies which he/she should not perform, or to refrain from performing an official act which he/she should perform, or a person who acts as an intermediary for this, shall be punished with imprisonment between six months and five years.   A person who gives or promises a present or other material benefit to an official person so that he/she performs an official act within the framework of his/her official authorisation which he/she must perform, or to refrain from performing an official act which he/she otherwise should not perform, or a person who acts as an intermediary for this, shall be punished with a fine or with imprisonment of up to three years. Regarding the criminal acts contained in paragraphs 1 and 2, the person who has given or has promised a bribe upon a request from an official person, and has reported it before he/she has found out that the offence has been discovered, shall not be punished. The provisions from paragraphs 1,2 and 3 are also applicable  when the bribe is given or promised to a responsible person, a responsible person from a foreign legal entity, a person who performs duties of public interest and a foreign official person, in relation to the offence from Article 357.   If the act from paragraph 1 is committed by a legal entity, it shall be punished with a fine.  The given present or property gain shall be confiscated, and returned to the person who gave the bribe when the bribe was given  to a responsible person, a responsible person from within a foreign legal entity, a person who performs duties of public interest or to a foreign official person. 
3. Do fraud and corruption, as criminalised by article 1 of the PIF convention and the first Protocol, constitute predicate offences of money laundering? 
The Law Amending the Criminal Code (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia“, Nos. 37/96, 80/99, 4/02, 43/03 and 19/04) harmonises the national legislation with the Second Protocol to the Convention on Protection of European Communities’ Financial Interests.  Article 273 of the Criminal Code criminalises money laundering and other proceeds from crime as a specific crime in the Macedonian legislation.   The amendments to the Criminal Code broaden the legal description of the crime of money laundering and other proceeds of crime in compliance with the acquis of the European Union and other international standards.  Namely, according to Article 273 Money laundering and other proceeds of crime, all crimes under Macedonian legislation are considered to be predicate offences, meaning that the crimes of Fraud and Corruption, pursuant to Article 1 of the Convention on Protection of European Communities’ Financial Interests and its First Protocol, are predicate criminal offences of money laundering.   4. Does national law provide for the concepts of criminal liability of heads of businesses and liability of legal entities for these offences? 
The provisions regarding the criminal liability of the managerial staff in the business entities and the legal entities are contained in the Criminal Code (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 37/96, 80/99, 4/02, 43/03, 19/04), and in the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 15/97, 44/02, and 74/04). According to the Chapter XXV - Criminal offences against public finances, payment operations and the economy, and Chapter XXX - Criminal offences against official duty, the perpetrators of these criminal acts may be sentenced to the following  sanctions : imprisonment; fine; prohibition of performing profession, an activity or an office; prohibition of  operating motor vehicle, and expulsion of a foreigner from the country (Article 33). The sanction of imprisonment may be pronounced only as a main sanction. The fine can be pronounced as a main sanction, and also as a secondary sanction together with the sanction of imprisonment or conditional sentence that determines the imprisonment sentence. If a sanction of both, imprisonment and fine, is prescribed for a single criminal offence, only one of them can be pronounced as a main sanction, except in cases when the law prescribes that both sanctions may be pronounced.  One or two secondary penalties may be pronounced together with the main sanction, when conditions foreseen by this Code exist. A compulsory sentencing to secondary sanction may be determined by Law. The sanction of Prohibition of performing a profession, an activity or a function may be pronounced only as a secondary sanction together with imprisonment sentence or conditional sentence that determines the imprisonment sentence. The sanctions of Prohibition of operating motor vehicle and Expulsion of a foreigner from the country may be pronounced if the offender is sentenced to a sanction of imprisonment or to a fine, conditional sentence or court reprimand. The sanctions of Prohibition of operating motor vehicle may be pronounced as a sole sanction to the perpetrator of the criminal act committed out of negligence, when the prescribed sanction is fine or imprisonment of up to one year, if the criminal offence is commited under particularly extenuating circumstances. Regarding the confiscation of property and proceeds, it is essential that no one may retain the direct or indirect property or proceeds acquired through a crime. The proceeds shall be confiscated with the court decision by which the perpetration of the crime was determined, under the conditions foreseen by this Code. The Court will bring a decision on confiscation in a procedure determined by law, even when, because of factual or legal obstacles the criminal procedure against the perpetrator of the criminal act is impossible. The confiscated property may be returned to other country under conditions determined by international agreement (Article 97).  A criminal liability of legal entity is introduced for the first time  in the national legislation with the Amendments of the Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia in March 2004. In accordance with the Code (Article 28a), the legal entity is criminally responsible if the criminal act was committed by an act or omission of due supervision on the part of the managerial body or responsible person within the legal entity, or other person authorised to undertake actions in the name of the legal entity within the frameworks of his authorities, or when that person misuses its authorisation in order to acquire profit for the legal entity.  The criminal responsibility of a legal entity does not preclude the responsibility of the perpetrator of the criminal act. For the crimes determined by law (such as the criminal offences of fraud in the operation with securities and shares, smuggling, money laundering and other proceeds from crimes, etc), criminally responsible are all legal entities, with exception of the State. The foreign legal entities are criminally responsible if the crime has been committed within the territory of the Republic of Macedonia, irrespective of whether they have a franchise or branch office that performs activity on the Macedonian territory.   The following penalties can be imposed for criminal offences committed by legal entities: fine; temporary prohibition of performing certain activity; permanent prohibition of performing  certain activity: and cessation of the legal entity (Article 96a).  The fine is imposed in an amount which may not be lower than 100.000 MKD, or larger than 30.000.000 MKD. For criminal offences committed from self-interest, or for criminal offences that cause large property damage, a fine of twice of the amount of the maximum of this sanction may be pronounced, or a fine in proportion to the extent of caused damage or acquired profit, but only up to ten times of the amount. A temporary prohibition on performing a certain activity in duration between one and three years is pronounced together with a fine, if a crime was committed within the performance of activity of the legal entity, for which a fine or imprisonment sanction of up to three years is prescribed for a natural person, and depending on the modus operandi of the crime and expected danger of repeated performance of such or similar crimes.   A permanent prohibition on performing a certain activity, from the activities performed by the legal entity, is pronounced together with a fine, if a crime was committed for which a sanction of imprisonment of at least three years is prescribed for a natural person, and depending on the modus operandi of the crime and expected danger of repeated performance of such or similar crimes.  The court shall impose this sanction too, when a criminal act is committed after a previous sentence which imposes a temporary prohibition of performing certain activity for the legal entity. The sanction -  cessation of the legal entity is imposed together with the fine, if a crime is committed for which a sanction of imprisonment of at least five years is prescribed for a natural person, and depending on the modus operandi of the crime and expected danger of repeated performance of such or similar crimes . The court shall impose this sanction too, when a criminal act is committed after a previous sentence which imposes a permanent prohibition of performing activity of the legal entity.  The sanction of- temporary or permanent prohibition of performing certain activity and a cessation of the legal entity may not be imposed to the legal entities that are established by law, as well as to a political party. The competent court, on the basis of a final sentence which has imposed the sanction of cessation of legal entity, initiates a legally determined procedure for liquidation of the legal entity within 30 days from the day when the sentence has became final. The legal entity for which a bankruptcy procedure have been initiated, shall be punished for criminal offences committed before the opening of the bankruptcy procedure. In the process of bringing a sanction, the court shall take into consideration the balance of the situation and the profit and loss balance sheet of the legal entity, type of activity and the nature and severity of the committed crime.   If the court determines a fine for two or more criminal offences in concurrence, the single sanction may not reach the sum of the individually determined sanctions, nor may exceed the legally prescribed maximum of the sanction for a legal entity.   The confiscated property and proceeds acquired through a criminal offence perpetrated by legal entity are subject to the provisions of the Criminal Code regarding the manner of confiscation, protection of the injured party and confiscation from a legal entity.   If the confiscation of the property or proceeds can not be executed due to cessation of the legal entity before carrying out of the confiscation, than the founder or founders of the legal entity, i.e. in cases of a trade company, the shareholders or stock-owners jointly will be obligated to pay a financial amount that is corresponding to the acquired proceeds.  The seizure of objects from the legal entities is executed under the conditions foreseen by the Criminal Code (Article 96). The provisions regarding the procedure for legal entities are contained in the Law on Criminal Procedure, and these provisions are applied in the procedure for establishing a criminal liability, and when pronouncingsanction and other measures to the legal entities as perpetrators of criminal offences.   5. Has your country established jurisdiction over all of these offences? 
According to the procedural provisions of the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 15/97, 44/02 and 74/04), the Courts within their territorial and ratione materiae jurisdiction established under the Law on Courts (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 36/95, 45/95 and 64/03) are competent in proceedings regarding all types of crime.. Namely, according to this Law, the proceedings are carried out before the Basic Courts, while the Appellate Courts are deciding upon appeals.   The basic courts hold trials in chambers comprised of two judges and three lay judges for crimes for which the law prescribes a prison sentence of 15 years or life imprisonment and in chambers comprised of one judge and two lay judges for crimes for which the law prescribes more lenient penalty. Crimes for which a fine and imprisonment of up to three years is prescribed as a main penalty, are decided in the first instance by a single judge.  The courts of second instance  hold trials in chambers comprised of five judges for crimes for which the law prescribes 15 years or or life imprisonment, and in chambers comprised of three judges for crimes for which the law prescribes more lenient penalty. When trying is taking place in the second instance, at the hearings, the chamber is comprised of two judges and three lay judges.   
Protection of the euro against counterfeiting (“third pillar aspects”) 

1. Has your country acceded to the 1929 International Convention on the Suppression of Counterfeiting? 
The Republic of Macedonia has not acceded to the 1929 International Convention on Suppression of Counterfeiting (the League of Nations). During this year, the competent institutions will commence a procedure for acceding to the Convention and for its ratification.  2. Does national law criminalise the making and altering of counterfeit currency and related offences? Does it ensure that such activity is punished by appropriate criminal penalties, including imprisonment and the possibility of extradition? 
Pursuant to Article 122, point 12 of the Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 37/96, 80/99, 4/02, 43/03 and 19/04), the notion “money” means coins and banknotes, that according to the law, are in circulation in the Republic of Macedonia or in a foreign country. This means that the criminal legislation of the Republic of Macedonia provides protection regarding the falsifying of Euro and other foreign currencies .  According to the Criminal Code, the criminal act of Counterfeiting money (Article 268) is prescribed in the Chapter relating to the crimes against public finances, payment operations and the economy. The action of perpetrating of these criminal offences is manifested in several forms.  The first form of this criminal act is making counterfeit money with intention of releasing them in circulation as real.; The second form of the crime is altering real money with intention of releasing them in circulation, and the third one is releasing counterfeit money in circulation. The prescribed sanction for the above mentioned acts is imprisonment between one and ten years. The same sanction shall also apply to the perpetrator of paragraph 2, where a special form of the criminal act is prescribed, i.e. acquiring counterfeit money with intention of releasing them in circulation as real. A qualified, aggravated form of this crime is also prescribed, which consists of causing a disorder of the economy because of the crimes from paragraph 1 and 2. For this crime the perpetrator shall be sanctioned with imprisonment of at least five years, which means that the general maximum of the imprisonment may be reached.( 15 years).  The Code also incriminates two less severe forms of counterfeiting money: first, when the counterfeited money which were received as real will be further released in circulation as real, and second, when the perpetrator knows that the counterfeited money were actually counterfeited, or that the counterfeited money were released in circulation and he/she does not report this.  For such crimes, the perpetrator shall be sanctioned with a fine or with imprisonment of up to three years.  The counterfeited money are mandatorily confiscated. With regards to the possibility for extradition of accused or convicted persons for such crimes pursuant to Article 502 and Article 525 of the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 15/97, 44/02, 74/04), as well as Article 2 paragraph 1 and Article 5 of the European Convention on Extradition and the Article 2 of the Second Additional Protocol to the European Convention on Extradition (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 32/99) the extradition for fiscal crimes is allowed. Contributing to the above mentioned, and pursuant to Articles 118 and 119 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia, the international agreements which are ratified in accordance with the Constitution are part of the legal order and they can not be amended with a law.  The Article 269 of the Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia incriminates the Counterfeiting of securities, as well. This crime consists of making counterfeited securities and altering real securities, i.e. using such counterfeited securities as real or giving them to another person for use, as well as direct use of counterfeited securities. The prescribed sanction for such crime is imprisonment between one and ten years, and the same sanction also applies to a person who acquires counterfeited securities with intention of releasing them in circulation as real. A sanction of imprisonment of up to three years is foreseen for a perpetrator who releases in circulation false securities which he had received as real, or a person who knows that the counterfeited securities were actually counterfeited or that counterfeited securities were released in circulation and does not report this. The counterfeited securities are mandatorily confiscated. The following crimes are related to this crime; Counterfeiting marks of value, Article 270 of the Criminal Code; Making, procuring or selling counterfeiting means, Article 271; Counterfeiting marks for marking goods, measures and weights, Article 272; as well as Counterfeiting a document, Article 378 ; Counterfeiting or destruction of business books, Article 280, and Counterfeiting an official document, Article 361 of the Criminal Code.  3. Does national law ensure that it has the appropriate jurisdiction over offences involving counterfeiting, both of the euro and of other currencies? 
The national legislation provides appropriate jurisdiction over crimes involving counterfeiting of Euro and other currencies. More specifically, the relevant jurisdiction is ensured through the provisions included in the Law on Courts (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 36/95, 45/95 and 64/03) that define the legal jurisdiction over these crimes, through the Law on Criminal Procedure (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 15/97, 44/02 and 74/04) and the provisions of the Criminal Code (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 37/96, 80/99, 4/02, 43/03 and 19/04).  According to the provisions of the Criminal Code, the crime Counterfeiting currency (Article 268) is a crime prosecuted ex officio and a sentence between one and ten years prison may be imposed on the perpetrator of this crime, while for the qualified form of the crime, at least five year prison sentence may be imposed. 
4. Does national law provide for the concept of criminal liability of legal entities for these offences? 
In the Republic of Macedonia, the concept of criminal liability of legal entities (Article 28a) included in the Criminal Code (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 37/96, 80/99 4/02 and 43/04) has been defined as in most of the European criminal legislations, bearing in mind that introduction of criminal liability of legal entities is becoming a common feature of the reforms in the European criminal legislations.   Criminal liability of legal entities is prescribed in Chapter XXV: Crimes against public finances, payment operations and economy crimes, money laundering and other proceeds from crime - Article 273, Issuing an irregular check and credit card abuse - Article 274, Fraud in working with securities and shares - Article275, Smuggling - Article 278, etc. In accordance with the Criminal Code (Article 28a), the legal entity is criminally liable in cases established by law, and in respect of certain crimes, if the criminal act has been committed by an action or omission of due supervision by the managerial body or responsible person at the legal person, or other person authorised to undertake actions on behalf of the legal entity within his/her authorities, or when the person has overstepped his/her authorities  in order to gain benefit for the legal entity.  Criminal liability of a legal entity does not exclude the liability of the perpetrator of the crime, and in respect of crimes determined by law, all legal entities, except the state are criminally liable. Regarding foreign legal entities, the Law prescribes that they are criminally liable, if the crime has been committed within the territory of the Republic of Macedonia, irrespective of whether they have a representative or branch office that performs activities on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia.      Such formulation of the conditions for liability implies opting for the theory of identification, which has a restrictive meaning, and is closer to the principle of subjective liability of the management body or the representative of the legal entity.  According to the provisions of the Criminal Code (Article 96), the following penalties can be imposed for crimes committed by legal entities: fine; temporary prohibition on conducting certain activity; permanent prohibition on performing certain activity: and a cessation of the legal entity. The provisions of Article 98 -100 of the Criminal Code are applied in terms of confiscating the property and proceeds form crime of the legal person.  If the confiscation of the property or proceeds can not be executed due to the fact that the legal entity has ceased to exist before carrying out of the confiscation, than the founder or founders of the legal entity, i.e. in cases of a stock holding company, the shareholders or stock-owners jointly will be obligated to pay a financial amount corresponding to the acquired proceeds. In cases of confiscation of objects from the legal entity, the provisions of Article 101-a of the Criminal Code apply, i.e. the legal consequences of the sentence, which are related to the verdicts for certain crimes, may apply only if the sentence of imprisonment is pronounced against the perpetrator of the crime.  The provisions of the Criminal Code prescribe that in the process of meting out a punishment, the court shall take into consideration the profit balance sheet of the legal entity, type of the activity and the nature and the seriousness of the committed crime. Criminal liability of legal entities in respect of crimes of organised crime and fraud is prescribed and the form of imposed penalty is fine.  ` The Law on Criminal Procedure contains a Chapter elaborating the proceedings against legal entities, in particular, the procedure for establishing criminal liability and pronouncing a sentence and other measures against legal entities as perpetrators of crimes, and if the provisions of this Chapter do not determine otherwise, the provisions of the Law on Criminal Procedure shall apply in the proceedings against legal entities.  Similarly, the Macedonian legal system, according to the Law on Misdemeanours prescribes the offence Liability of legal entities, which is based on the same principles of pressumed liability.    5. Does your country recognise, for the purposes of establishing habitual criminality, sentences handed down in other Member States for these offences? 
The Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 37/96, 19/04) does not explicitly regulate the status of foreign verdicts as a basis for establishing of habitual criminality. Still, the judicial practice recognises the effects of foreign criminal judgments as judicial antecedents regarding the habitual criminality and determination of the sanction for the perpetrator of the new criminal offence. The foreign court verdict is recognised as a predicate for habitual criminality under the conditions of double incrimination, i.e. only regarding criminal offences which our Criminal Code also recognises as criminal offences.  Pursuant to Article 39, paragraph 4, of the Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia, the habitual criminality is a facultative aggravating circumstance, which means that a repeated offender is sentenced within the frames prescribed in the Law, whereby the habitual criminality has an impact in determining of the pronounced sentence close to the upper threshold of the legally prescribed sanction.  Furthermore, the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 15/97, 44/02 and 74/04) in Chapter XXX stipulates the procedure for provision of international legal aid and enforcement of international agreements in criminal law cases involving this type of criminality.  Pursuant to Article 505, the domestic courts can accept requests by foreign bodies for enforcement of criminal sentences of foreign courts or of international courts, if it is provided through international agreements or if there is reciprocity, or if the sanctions are handed down by a domestic court according to the Criminal Code. The competent courts bring the verdicts in a chamber composed of three judges. The Public Prosecutor and the Defence Attorney shall be informed about the session of the chamber. The territorial jurisdiction of the court shall be determined according to the last permanent residence of the sentenced person in the Republic of Macedonia. If the sentenced person had no permanent residence in the Republic of Macedonia, the territorial jurisdiction shall be determined according to their place of birth. If the sentenced person neither had a permanent residence, nor was born in the Republic of Macedonia, the Supreme Court shall assign the conduct of proceedings to one of the courts of real jurisdiction. In the pronouncement of the sentence, the Court will include the full verdict and the title of the court from the foreign sentence and will pronounce a sanction appropriate to the sanction pronounced by the foreign court. The elaboration of the verdict will present the reasons by which the court was guided in the deliberation of the sanction. The sentence may be appealed by the public prosecutor and by the sentenced person or their defence attorney. If the foreign national sentenced by a domestic court, or the person authorised by contract files an application to the first instance court for serving the sanction in the country of origin, the first instance court will act in conformity with an international agreement regulating this matter. The enforcement of a sanction of an international court is accomplished according to the international agreement establishment the court, ratified in accordance with the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia. The criminal trial chamber from the first instance court of local jurisdiction confirms the authenticity and enforceability of the sentence of the international court and establishes the mode for enforcement of sanctions and other measures 6. Have you formally designated a National Central Office on currency counterfeiting in line with Article 12 of the 1929 Geneva Convention and Regulation 1338/2001? 
In the Republic of Macedonia, there is no formally designated National Central Office on Currency Counterfeiting in line with Article 12 of the 1929 Geneva Convention and the Regulation 1338/2001. However, there is a precise designation of institutions responsible for centralisation and processing of information concerning counterfeiting banknotes and coins, while the competencies regarding the investigation, prevention and repression are also precisely defined.   Namely, the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia is in charge of the technical analysis and central collection and processing of information on counterfeited banknotes and coins of MKD, and the Ministry of the Interior is competent for technical analysis of the counterfeited Euros and other currency and coins. The Ministry of the Interior i.e. the Section for Criminal Police is competent for keeping records of all registered counterfeited banknotes of MKD, Euro and other currency and coins and on the perpetrators of the crimes related to counterfeiting currency, as well as for informing INTERPOL and other countries about cases of counterfeiting money, and for undertaking all necessary measures in the prevention and fight against counterfeiting currencies. 
J. DRUGS 

1. Please provide information on legislation or other rules governing this area, and their adhesion to relevant international conventions. 
In accordance with the UNGASS principles and the Stabilisation and Association Agreement   and National Programme for Suppression of Drug Abuse and Illicit Drug Trafficking, the Macedonian Government undertakes activities for harmonisation of national drug control legislation with European Union acquis on Drugs. The Republic of Macedonia has ratified the UN Single Convention on Narcotic Drugs (1961),   the Protocol amending the Single Convention (1972), the UN Convention on Psychotropic Substances (1971), and the UN Convention against Illicit Traffic in Narcotic Drugs and Psychotropic Substances (1988). The legal framework for drug control in the Republic of Macedonia is defined by the following national laws:   Law on  Production of Narcotic Drugs (“Official Gazette of SFRY”, No. 13/91; taken over as national regulation, under Article 5 of the Constitutional Law on the Implementation of the 1991 Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia);   Law on Precursors Control (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 37/04);   Law  Designating Bodies to Conduct Certain Activities in the Field of Production and Trade in Narcotics (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 21/83);   Decision on the List of Narcotic Drugs (“Official Gazette of SFRY’, No. 70/78, 14/81, 39/82, 28/85, 10/87, 53/88, 2/89 and 7/90);   Law on Medicines, Auxiliary Medicines and Medical Aids (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 21/98);   Decision on the List of Narcotics that May be Released for Trade for Medical and Veterinary Purposes (“Official Gazette of SFRY”, No. 70/78, 52/83 and 47/85). Chapter 21-Crimes against people’s health of the Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 37/96, 80/99, 4/02, 43/03 and 19/04) incriminates activities, which due to the scope, scale and manner of endangerment, can cause adverse health consequences for the people. Drug abuse is incriminated by the crimes of: Unauthorised production and release in trade of narcotic drugs, psychotropic substances and precursors (Article 215) and Enabling use of narcotic drugs and psychotropic substances (Article 216) of the Criminal Code. Article 215 of the Criminal Code incriminates the activities of unauthorised production and release for trade of narcotics, psychotropic substances and precursors. The act can be perpetrated by any person. A prison sentence between one and ten years is prescribed for perpetrators of all forms of this crime. This article furthermore envisages the release of a perpetrator, with the exception of the organiser, who shall disclose the crime and shall significantly contribute to its disclosing. In addition, it prescribes compulsory confiscation of narcotics, psychotropic substances and precursors, as well as movable or immovable items used for their production, transfer of dealing. The crime incriminated in Article 216 of the Criminal Code is perpetrated by inducing, giving or making premises available, or otherwise enabling another person to use narcotic drugs. A prison sentence of three months to five years is prescribed for the perpetrators of all forms of this crime. The issue of confiscation of property and proceeds is regulated by the provisions of Articles 97 to 100 of the Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 37/96, 80/99, 4/02, 43/03 and 19/04). Pursuant to Article 97 of the Criminal Code, nobody can retain direct or indirect proceeds acquired from crime. The proceeds shall be confiscated, based on a court decision that establishes the perpetration of the crime. The court may also adopt a decision on confiscation in cases in which there are legal obstacles preventing institution of criminal proceedings against the perpetrator of the crime. Under conditions determined by a ratified international agreement, the confiscated property can be returned to a third state. Pursuant to Article 98, criminal proceeds in form of money, movable or immovable valuable items, as well as any other ownership, property or assets, material or non-material rights shall be confiscated, and if their confiscation is not possible, another property that corresponds to the value of the acquired proceeds shall be confiscated. The proceeds may be confiscated from third parties, to whom they have been transferred without an appropriate compensation, if they were not aware, but were obliged and could have known of the criminal origin of the proceeds. The Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 15/97, 44/02 and 74/04) envisages separate provisions for application of special investigative techniques (Articles 142-b, 142-c, 142-e and 142-f) that are in accordance with the European requirements for application of up to date measures necessary for detection, prosecution and conviction of perpetrators, especially in the context of organised crime, corruption, money laundering and other serious forms of crimes. Chapter XVIII-Investigative activities of the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 15/97, 44/02 and 74/04), i.e. the new provisions (Articles 202, 203-a, 203-b, 203-d and 207), envisage a procedure for application of the measure of “temporary seizure of  property or assets connected with a crime that refers to temporary freezing, seizure, confiscation of funds, bank accounts, financial transactions or proceeds from crime”. These new legal provisions are implemented and harmonised with the ratified conventions in this area: Convention on Laundering, Search, Seizure and Confiscation of the Proceeds from Crime (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 58/99), the UN Convention against Trans-national Organised Crime (Palermo Convention) and its Protocols (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 70/04) and the UN Convention against Illicit Trafficking in Drugs and other Psychotropic Substances and Precursors (Vienna Convention). The Law on the Public Prosecutor’s Office (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 38/04) regulates the procedure for efficient detection and prosecution of perpetrators of offences related to organised crime and corruption. Pursuant to Article 29 of this Law, a separate Unit specialised for fight against organised crime and corruption has been established at the Public Prosecutor’s Office. For purposes of efficient work this Law strengthens the cooperation among competent bodies. Thus, the Law envisages that in course of a procedure, the Public Prosecutor may request certain employees of the Ministry of the Interior or from other competent bodies (Customs Administration, Financial Police etc) to be put at his/her disposal for realisation of his/her function (Article 21). 
2. What are the main characteristics of your country’s policy on combating drugs? 
The strategic commitment of the Republic of Macedonia is harmonisation of national drug control legislation with European Unions acquis on Drugs. Such a commitment also implies  institutional capacity building for drug control  with continuous education of law enforcement personnel dealing with the fight against drug trafficking; undertaking of information dissemination on drugs and drug abuse and; preventive activities and repressive measures. In 1996, the Macedonian Government adopted a National Programme for Suppression of Drug Abuse and Illicit Drug Trafficking (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 35/96), which has the following goals:   Modernisation of the national drug control legislation;   Establishment of Inter-ministerial State Commission for Combating Illicit Production, Trade and Abuse of Drugs;   Creation of a central information system for drugs and drug abuse;  Institutional capacity building;   Development of programmes for prevention of drug abuse and for treatment, rehabilitation and social reintegration of drug abusers, on the basis of enhanced community participation;   Upgrading the operative capacities of law enforcement agencies through training, improvement of equipment, and enhanced participation in the preventive programmes in the community;   Establishment of municipal councils for fight against drugs and creation of communal drug abuse prevention programmes with active participation and collaboration of local authorities, police, judiciary, health, educational, and social welfare institutions NGOs and the private sector;   Informative activities aimed at raising the awareness against drug abuse;  International cooperation. Under the National Programme for Suppression of Drug Abuse and Illicit Drug Trafficking the Government of the Republic of Macedonia in 1998 established the Inter-ministerial State Commission for Combating Illicit Production, Trade and Abuse of Drugs. It prepares the Programme for control of illicit production and trade in narcotic drugs psychotropic substances and precursors, and for prevention of drug abuse, and submits it to the Government. The main goal of the State Commission for Combating Illicit Production, Trade and Abuse of Drugs is drug demand and drug supply reduction. The main objectives of the programme are horizontal coordination and advancement of cooperation among bodies and agencies for drug control; advancement and coordination of activities for early detection, treatment, rehabilitation and social reintegration of drug abusers; prevention of HIV/AIDS and other contagious diseases among them; support to the NGOs in the field of drug demand reduction activities and; activities in the area of drug information and health education. 3. What are the principal measures deployed? How does co-ordination between law enforcement agencies work? Is there a clear allocation of tasks and coordination: a) between authorities competent for drug demand reduction? b) between authorities involved in reducing drug supply? 
In the fight against drug abuse the Republic of Macedonia is guided by the need for balanced measures and activities aimed at drug demand and drug supply reduction. In the field of repression, the Ministry of the Interior and the Customs Administration undertake continuous measures and activities for suppression of international criminal groups trafficking narcotic drugs, psychotropic substances and precursors, as well as for suppression of distribution of narcotic drugs, psychotropic substances and precursors on the illicit market in the country. The Inter-ministerial State Commission for Combating Illicit Production, Trade and Abuse of Drugs is in charge of the horizontal coordination of the activities for drug control performed by various ministries in the Government of the Republic of Macedonia. The Committee is comprised of representatives of the relevant ministries (the Ministry of the Interior; the Ministry of Foreign Affairs; the Ministry of Justice; the Ministry of Health; the Ministry of Education and Science; the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy; the Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and Water Resources Management and; the Youth and Sports Agency). It also coordinates the cooperation with the international organisations for drug control. The National Programme for Suppression of Drug Abuse and Illicit Drug Trafficking establishes the main measures and tasks for all entities in the Republic of Macedonia responsible for implementation of the activities aimed at dug demand and drug supply reduction. In the field of prevention, the Ministry of Education and Science, the Ministry of Health and the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy, in compliance with their legal obligations and the annual operational programmes, undertake activities aimed at drug abuse prevention (realising drug abuse awareness campaigns and educational activities among the youth and general population) and treatment, rehabilitation and re-socialisation of drug abusers. The Law enforcement agencies, on the basis of their legal competencies, fulfil the obligations to prosecute the drug-related crimes. In addition, they participate in the implementation of the measures for re-socialisation of the drug addicts by consistent application of the alternative -measures of sanctioning. 
)  Coordination between the bodies responsible for drug demand reduction The Inter-ministerial State Committee for Combating Illicit Production, Trade and Abuse of Drugs in its programme defines the area of activity of the main agents responsible for the  implementation of the programme activities for prevention of drug use and abuse.  The Ministry of Health and the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy implement the activities for early detection, treatment and rehabilitation and re-socialisation of drug abusers, as well as the activities for prevention of spreading of Hepatitis and AIDS. The Ministry of Labour and Social Policy prepares a programme for activities for social integration drug abusers, and it implements them in cooperation with the non-governmental organisations active in this field. The Ministry of Education and Science in the curricula of primary and secondary schools has incorporated educational activities aimed at increasing knowledge and skills of youth to resist drug use. For further improvement of the inter-ministerial coordination and cooperation, as well as for increased efficiency of other activities, the Inter-ministerial State Committee for Combating Illicit Production, Trade and Abuse of Drugs will prepare a National Strategy for Drug Control and Action plan for its implementation. b)  Distribution of tasks and coordination among the competent bodies involved in the drug supply reduction The Ministry of the Interior, within its legal competencies for prevention and suppression of illicit drug trafficking, constantly cooperates and coordinates its activities with the Ministry of Finance – Customs Administration of the Republic of Macedonia, the Ministry of Health, the Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and Water Resources Management and with other relevant ministries and institutions. Considering that the Ministry of the Interior and the Customs Administration are the main actors in the realisation of activities and measures aimed at drug supply reduction, their cooperation is organised through direct contacts between the specialised Sector for Illicit Drug Trafficking within the Department for Organised crime in the Ministry of the Interior, and the Customs Administration, through exchange of information and carrying out of joint operational measures and activities.   The Memorandum on Cooperation between the Ministry of the Interior and the Ministry of Finance signed on 18 November, 2004 regulates the modalities of the cooperation between law enforcement agencies within the two ministries in the fight against drug related crime. In this respect, in order to avoid overlapping or duplication of activities and human resources the areas of common interest have been defined. A system of continuous coordination in cases of joint competence has been built. In addition, a procedure for exchange and protection of operational data and intelligence information has been established, along with criteria for use of data from databases in the two ministries. The Ministry of the Interior continuously cooperates with the Public Prosecutor’s Office as well as with the investigative judges in cases of illicit drug trafficking, which contributes to achieving satisfactory level of concerted action when undertaking certain activities.  4. How does co-operation and exchange of information with other national authorities work? Are there any Memorandums of Understanding or Joint Agreements between the various law enforcement services with responsibility for tackling the supply of drugs? Are there similar agreements with relevant industries? If so, please provide details. 
According to the National Programme for Suppression of Drug Abuse and Illicit Drug Trafficking (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 35/96), an Inter-ministerial State Commission for Combating Illicit Production, Trade and Abuse of Drugs of the Macedonian Government has been established in 1996. This body is in charge of horizontal coordination of the national activities aimed at realisation of the drug policy of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia. The Ministry of the Interior coordinates its activities with the Ministry of Education, Ministry of Labour and Social Policy, Ministry of Forestry and Water Resources Management and with the Ministry of Health. The Sector for Illicit Drug Trafficking at the Ministry of the Interior, cooperates with the inspectors of the Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and Water Resources Management, primarily on the control of legal poppy cultivation, as well as on detecting illicit poppy and cannabis sativa cultivation, while in cooperation with the Ministry of Health, the Sector works on control of precursors, as well as on prevention of supply of legal drugs and chemicals to the illicit market, through joint controls of pharmacies and of the pharmaceutical industry. The Sector takes part in the realisation of educative programmes of the Ministry of Education and of the Agency of Youth and Sports, by holding lectures and presentations on the negative consequences of drug use for young people. The Ministry of the Interior, i.e. its Sector for Illicit Drug Trafficking, cooperates with the Ministry of Finance i.e. the Customs Administration. Regular meetings among the Sector, the Border Police, and the Sector for Control and Investigations within the Customs Administration have been held since August 2004, in cooperation with EUROPOL – “PROXIMA” and CAFAO-MAK Missions. The objective of the meetings is to improve the cooperation, shorten procedures for information exchange, and facilitate the operative coordination. Within its competencies, the Ministry also cooperates with several non-governmental organisations, which are active in this area and with media providing information about drug related crime, trends in drug use and about the current situation regarding abuse of new synthetic drugs. Currently, there are no memoranda of understanding (MoU) or agreements among different law enforcement agencies that have competencies in drug control. Activities for preparation of MoUs among bodies are ongoing. There are no agreements with relevant industries that produce drugs, psychotropic substances and precursors in the Republic of Macedonia. 5. What about co-operation at the international level (liaison officers)? 
In the fight against drug related crimes, the Ministry of the Interior, according to its competencies, develops extensive international cooperation with the police services of the countries of the Balkan region, European Union and some other countries. Thus far, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia has signed, and the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia has ratified six Agreements on Cooperation in the Fight against Terrorism, Organised Crime, Illicit Trafficking in Narcotic Drugs, Psychotropic Substances and Precursors. The Agreement with Turkey was ratified in 1992, with Romania in 2004, with Albania in 1992, with Bulgaria in 2003, with Slovenia in 1995 and with Croatia in 1997. In addition, the Republic of Macedonia has signed Agreements with the Russian Federation, the French Republic, Ukraine and the Republic of Montenegro. The signing of the Agreements with Switzerland and the Republic of Hungary is pending. The police cooperation with third countries is conducted through INTERPOL liaison officers and channels; the SECI (South-East European Cooperation Initiative) liaison officers, and liaison officers coming from third countries appointed in the Republic of Macedonia.  The Republic of Macedonia has its representatives-liason officers from the Ministry of the Interior and the Customs Administration at the Headquarters of the SECI Regional Centre for Combating Trans- border Crime in Bucharest- Romania, while permanent liaison officers from the Republic of Bulgaria, Republic of Greece and form the French Republic have been appointed to the Republic of Macedonia.  Police cooperation has also been established with liaison officers appointed from contries having seats in the neighbouring countries, namely representatives from the Scandinavian countries, the USA (Drug Enforcement Administration-DEA) and Germany. For more details see 24_G_10At operational level, the international cooperation with third countries is carried out through INTERPOL in which respect, the Ministry of the Interior has established contacts and has realised successful operative actions with respective services of the Republic of Bulgaria, Republic of Croatia, Republic of Slovenia, Republic of Austria, Federal Republic of Germany, the Netherlands and Republic of Turkey. 6. How do you co-operate with international bodies operating in the drugs field, such as UNODC, INCB, Commission on Narcotic Drugs, Pompidou Group, WHO etc.? 
The Republic of Macedonia is a party to all UN Drug Conventions and closely cooperates with specialised agencies and other international organisations. These activities are coordinated by the Inter-ministerial State Commission for Combating Illicit Production, Trade and Abuse of Drugs in close cooperation with the Ministry of Foreign Affairs. The Republic of Macedonia submits reports on the implementation of UN drug conventions to the UNODC. Several ministries are responsible for competition and submission of the Annual Report Questionnaires. The Ministry of Health collects data on the export and import of narcotic drugs, psychotropic substances and precursors and prepares annual statistical reports on the production, consumption, storage, export and import of narcotic drugs, psychotropic substances and precursors, and together with Ministry of the Interior completes Annual Report Questionnaire Part I and Part II. The Ministry of the Interior keeps a National Register of Drug Users, and has data on drug related offences and illicit drug trafficking, seized drugs, and related human rights violation. The Ministry of the Interior and Customs Administration complete and submit The Annual Report Questionnaire Part III. The Ministry of Justice completes and submits The Annual Report Questionnaire Part I. The more intensive cooperation with the United Nations Drug Control Program (UNDCP) began in 1997/1998. The cooperation has been realised through concrete projects aimed at strengthening the institutional capacities of the Ministry of the Interior and of the Customs Administration, strengthening the control on the border crossing points, staff training, study visits, providing literature, manuals, methodological guidelines, as well as support to NGOs. In 1998, the joint project of UNDCP and PHARE entitled “Strengthening the Drug Control Capacities in the Republic of Macedonia” helped in harmonising the Macedonian legislation with the international standards for drug problem resolution. This project builds on international efforts to strengthen national law enforcement capacities in this area in Southeast Europe. March 1999, marked the beginning of a joint project of UNDCP and PHARE project for strengthening the police capacities in Southeast Europe – repression of drugs smuggling among Macedonia, Bulgaria and Romania. This project was completed in December 2002. It was related to the enlargement of national capacities for border crossing control in respect of  prevention of drug smuggling by air (airports in Macedonia, Bulgaria, Romania), water and land; development of national systems for intelligence data gathering and analysis for assistance in criminal investigations; organisation of coordinated control measures and; harmonisation of capacities for detection of drugs at road border crossing points between Bulgaria and Macedonia in order to cut off heroin smuggling (along the so-called Balkan route). Another regional project of UNODC for prevention of drug smuggling is to be completed by the end of 2004. In addition to Macedonia, the project encompasses Bosnia and Herzegovina, Bulgaria, Croatia, Romania, Slovenia and Serbia and Montenegro. The project should provide assistance for strengthening and enhancing the national capacities for intelligence gathering and analysis regarding major drug smuggling investigations in the abovementioned seven countries. If there are no special drug related intelligence departments in these countries, the project is to assist in the establishing of such structures, provide training, as well as database equipment and analytical software, which is entirely compatible with the Europol and INTERPOL standards. In the framework of the cooperation between the Republic of Macedonia and UNODC, new projects are being prepared, such as the National project for training of customs dogs for drug detection, as well as regional HIV/AIDS project. In 1999, the UNDCP established an Operative Branch Office in Sofia, Bulgaria, which initially covered the activities in Macedonia, and later extended its coverage to the other countries in the Region – the then Federal Republic of Yugoslavia, Croatia, Bosnia and Herzegovina and Slovenia. The Sofia Branch Office also includes a network of experienced national project officers in Tirana, Sarajevo and Skopje. Representatives of the Ministry of Foreign Affairs, Ministry of the Interior and the Inter-Ministerial State Commission for Combating Illicit Production, Trade and Abuse of Drugs participate in the activities of the Commission on Narcotic Drugs (CND). The Republic of Macedonia was CND member in period from 2000 to 2003. The Republic of Macedonia is not a member of the Pompidou Group. The Ministry of Foreign Affairs prepares a proposal for the Government of the Republic of Macedonia to adopt a decision on accession to the Pompidou Group. This decision is to be passed in 2005. The cooperation with the European Commission has been realised by implementation of several PHARE projects in the framework of PHARE Multi-Beneficiary Drugs Programme. Macedonia participated in the implementation of the projects entitled “Drugs Information System and Information Networks”, “Technical Assistance to Drug Demand Reduction – Sub-regional project Harm Reduction”, “PHARE Precursors Project”, Phase 4 and 5 and “PHARE Synthetic Drugs Project”. The cooperation with the World Health Organisation (WHO) is carried out through the Ministry of Health. In 2000/2001, a joint project of the Ministry of Health, WHO and UNICEF - “Decentralisation of services for prevention and treatment of drug abuse, aimed at improvement of treatment of drug-dependant individuals and HIV prevention” began. The project envisaged opening of regional treatment centres. However, this failed due to a number of subjective and objective difficulties. In December 2003, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia signed a two-year Cooperation Agreement for the 2004/2005 period with the WHO Regional Office for Europe. Under the Agreement, support for development and improvement of projects in the health care will be provided. The planned activities are grouped in three key segments:  provision of health care services (expert technical interventions in the country), development of health care system infrastructure and health policy, as well as other relevant elements. One of the priority activities is support for opening new services for treatment of drug abusers. In September 2004, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, through the Ministry of Health, signed a two-year Agreement under the Program “Building a coordinated national response to HIV/AIDS” , No. of Grant MKD-304-G01-H with the Global Fund to fight AIDS. The part “Prevention of HIV Transmission among Intravenous Drug Users” envisages improvement and better accessibility to programmes for substitution therapy for intravenous drug users, by opening of four treatment centres in the following 2 years. 
7. Do you have general guidelines on the fight against drug trafficking? 
Preventive and repressive measures are undertaken in the efforts for suppression of drug trafficking. The Republic of Macedonia actively undertakes measures and activities aimed at drug supply reduction and drug demand reduction.  The competent drug control authorities, thee Ministry of the Interior and Customs administration undertake continuous high impact operations aimed at suppression of drug supply and disbanding of organised criminal groups involved in drug trafficking along the Balkan Routes  The fight against drug trafficking is based on the following legal instruments: Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 37/96, 80/99, 4/02, 43/03 and 19/04), the Law on Criminal Procedures (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No 15/97), the Law on Public’s Prosecutor Office (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No 38/04, and the Law on Precursors Control (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, 37/04). The main objectives in the field of drug supply reduction are continuous realisation of operating methods (strategic and operational analysis of information; investigative procedures and collection, analysis, exchange and dissemination of information and data on drug seizures; improvement of cross-borders security measures; establishment of continuous and efficient inter-agency cooperation among Police, Customs authorities and juridical bodies; decisive action against individuals and criminal groups including assets seizure; promotion of “controlled delivery” technique and other special investigative methods; promotion of inter-regional cooperation between law enforcement agencies; regular exchange of information with EUROPOL and ERUROCUSTOMS; cooperation with UN  organs an agencies and; with other police organisations like DEA and BKA.  8. Is there adequate and sufficient administrative capacity to fight drug-related crime? 
According to the adopted Strategy and Action Plan for the Police Reform, a Department for organised crime with a specialised Sector for Illicit Drug Trafficking was established. The Sector has a total of 29 executors, of which 20 in the central services while 9 of them detached in the territorial Sectors for Internal Affairs. Within the frames of the Sector there are two sections: Section for Illegal trafficking with opiates, cocaine and cannabis, and Section for illegal trafficking in synthetic drugs, psychotropic substances and precursors.  One part of the employees have participated in trainings and seminars on fight against drug trafficking, organised by the Federal Service of Germany - BKA, the American Agency – DEA, French and British Service, as well as the FBI Academy  – ILEA in Budapest. In addition, 6 employees and 4 handlers of police dogs for detecting drugs from the Control and Investigation Sector within the Customs Administration, were trained on basic and specialised works on drug related crimes. The trainings were organised in cooperation with the organisation of CAFAO - MAK Mission, Bulgarian Customs Administration, the Turkish Embassy in the Republic of Macedonia in co-operation with TADOK (International Academy on Fight against Drug and Organised Crime) – Republic of Turkey, Customs Administration of the Federal Republic of Germany and at the FBI Academy - ILEA in Budapest. According to the Law on Police Academy (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 40/03) all legal assumptions are being fulfilled for continuous training of the personnel in the Ministry of the Interior and in other responsible bodies. The adoption of the Law on Witness Protection and the Law on Interception of Communications, which are in parliamentary procedure, wiil represent a formal and legal basis for the use of special investigation techniques.    9. What are the relevant structures and competencies of the police, customs and judicial authorities? Please describe their functioning in day to day practice. 
Relevant structures in the Republic of Macedonia directly in charge of undertaking measures and activities in suppression of trafficking in drugs, psychotropic substances and precursors are the Sector for Illicit Drug Trafficking at the Ministry of the Interior, and the Sector for Control and Investigations at the Customs Administration of the Ministry of Finance. The Criminal Police Section at the Ministry of the Interior has a Unit for suppression of  Drug Trafficking, while the regional sectors of the Ministry of the Interior have Sections for suppression of illicit drug trafficking, and the Skopje Internal Affairs Sector has a Department for suppression of drug trafficking. The competencies of authorised officials, who in their every day work undertake measures and activities for prevention of drug related crimes are regulated with the Law on Internal Affairs (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 19/95, 55/97, 38/02, 33/03 and 19/04), the Rulebook on the Manner of Performance of Duties by the Ministry of the Interior (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 12/98 and 15/03), and the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”,  No. 15/97, 44/02 and 74/04). These laws prescribe the following competencies:   checking/establishing the identity of individuals;   summoning citizens upon a written invitation for the purpose of gathering the necessary information;   requesting necessary information from citizens;    inspection of vehicles, individuals, and baggage;   redirecting, directing or limiting the movement of individuals and vehicles;   entering home and premises upon presenting identification documents and a court decision i.e. order;   securing and examining the crime scene;   search for individuals and items for the purpose of finding and apprehending perpetrators of crimes related to illicit trafficking in drugs, psychotropic substances and precursors, finding items related to such crimes, and gathering data on individuals and items. In gathering information and in terms of indications and undertaking concrete measures and activities in the combat against drugs, authorised officials of the Sector cooperate on daily basis with the uniformed officials. Aiming at upgrading the knowledge in the combat against drugs, since 2002, in cooperation with the OSCE, the Ministry has been organising three-day courses on topic “Identification of Drugs, Legal Procedure and Execution of Searches”.  In the context of prevention, the Sector and the regional units undertake activities to inform secondary and elementary school students about the dangers of drug use, organising lectures, debates and discussions on prevention of drug abuse, while in cooperation with the uniformed police, there are activities aimed to prevent drug selling and gathering of drug users at public places and in abandoned objects. The Customs Administration is a state body within the Ministry of Finance. The Sector for Control and Investigations within the Customs Administration is in charge of activities for suppression of drug smuggling at national level. The competencies of the Customs Administration are regulated with the Law on Customs Administration (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 46/04), Customs Law (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 21/98, 26/98, 63/98, 86/99, 25/00, 109/01, 4/02 and 55/02) and other regulations. The Customs Administration is in charge of customs surveillance of goods and passenger transport on the border crossing points from the aspect of suppressing the smuggling of narcotic drugs and, customs surveillance of trade in precursors chemicals and their import, export and transit. Customs officers are authorised to carry out inspection and search of all individuals, vehicles and goods at border crossing points. In case of detecting an illegal shipment of narcotic drugs, the Customs Administration, through the Sector for Control and Investigations, implements investigative procedures and accordingly forwards a proposal for institution of criminal charges through the relevant Public Prosecutor’s Office, to the competent court. Based on the Law on Customs Administration and the Customs Law, in the context of inland customs operations, customs officers may stop, inspect and search vehicles used for transportation of goods. In respect of precursor import and export, the Customs Administration examines whether a certain shipment is accompanied with a relevant permit issued by the Ministry of Health. If certain irregularities are established, the Customs Administration will stop the shipment and notify the Ministry of Health and the Sector for Control and Investigations for purposes of further investigations. The Sector for Control and Investigations monitors the situation and cases of narcotic drug smuggling on the territory of the entire country, independently or in cooperation with the Sector for Illicit Drug Trafficking at the Ministry of the Interior. These bodies also plan or directly implement activities of enhanced control at the border crossing points, or control vehicles for transportation of goods within the country.  Concerning crimes of unauthorised production and release for trade of narcotic drugs, psychotropic substances and precursors, the Public Prosecutor’s Office has the same competencies for detection and prosecution of perpetrators, as for other crimes and their perpetrators. Under the new Law on the Public Prosecutor’s Office, and following the amendments to the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 74/04), and the proposed Law on Conditions and Procedure for Interception of Communication, the  special investigative measures are extended, as well as the competencies of the Public Prosecutor’s Office considering that in certain cases an approval for such measures is required to be issued from this Office. It is considered that this would strengthen the combat against crimes related to narcotic drugs, psychotropic substances and precursors. 10. What measures have been adopted at the external borders? 
The “National Strategy for Integrated Border Management” defines the competencies of the Police and Customs regarding the detection of attempts of illegal import i.e. export of drugs at the border crossing points.   Having in mind the provisions of the Law on Internal Affairs (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 19/95, 55/97, 38/2002, 33/2003 and 19/2004) that define the scope of work of the separate organisational units of the Ministry of the Interior, in the course of the border crossing control, continuous measures directed at detection and suppression of attempts of illegal drug trafficking are undertaken by the Border Police Department.   Principally, the following measures were undertaken:   Design of plans by the Police Stations at the border crossing points that define the activities directed at detection of attempts of illicit drug trafficking;    Performance of so called selective controls of vehicles and persons with suspicious behaviour;     Performance of compulsory control of persons in the context of intensified state, local and international operative control;   Undertaking activities following orders for operative actions;   Gathering operative information concerning the illicit drug trafficking and their distribution to the competent organisational units at the Ministry;    Close cooperation and coordination of activities with  the Criminal Police Department: at local level with the regional Sectors and Sections for Internal Affairs and at central level with the Sector for Illicit Drug Trafficking;   Close cooperation with the Customs Administration in performing inspection of persons and vehicles;    Training of Border Police staff that control the state border crossing;    Equipping the border crossing points with adequate technical devices intended for detection of various types of drugs and use of such devices in the every day work at border crossing points;   Training for authorised officers – handlers of police dogs and training of police dogs and their use in everyday work. The Police operatively cooperates with the Customs Administration, which is competent for control of the import, export and transit of goods. The cooperation relates to providing information on trafficking channels, trafficking techniques, used devices and persons involved in trafficking, etc. The control and inspection of vehicles for transport, i.e. import, export and transit of goods is performed by the Customs Administration, which possesses necessary data on the goods, their sender and carrier (interesting from the viewpoint of the possibility to smuggle narcotic drugs). Upon a request of the Ministry of the Interior, the Customs Administration, in light of the abovementioned reasons, may perform activities of control and inspection in cooperation with the representatives of the Ministry of the Interior.  The Customs Administration through the Sector for Control and Investigations analyses the movement of goods (senders, carriers, transporters, drivers and vehicles) that transport goods in passenger, railway and air traffic.  The above referred to is undertaken with the aim of reducing the supply of and demand for all types of narcotic drugs by increasingly supervising the state border (passenger and goods traffic) and by intercepting international drug transportation channels. When undertaking measures carried out in cooperation among the Border Police, the Customs Administration and the Sector for Illicit Drug Trafficking, it is particularly taken into consideration that the preventive-repressive measures have no adverse impact on Macedonia’s openness and traffic flow, and its orientation towards tourism. 11. Have you created electronic data banks covering seizures of drugs in the last three years and other statistics? 
The Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Macedonia has created an electronic database on drug related crimes and perpetrators, in accordance with the Rulebook on the Manner of Operation of the Ministry of the Interior (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 12/98) and the Guidelines on the Working and Operative Records Kept at Police Stations.    The crime related data are managed using adequate programmes within the central information system of the Ministry of the Interior, where, there are statistical indicators on the number of crimes, on the perpetrators and the type of drugs, while the data on quantities of seized and confiscated drugs are recorded manually based on instituted criminal charges. Upon further data processing, statistical data are prepared (quarterly, three-quarterly, semi-annually and annually) about the crime rate in the area of trafficking in drugs on the territory of the entire country. The data on the crime offences and persons who possess and abuse narcotic drugs are kept separately and manually, in accordance with the Guidelines on Keeping Statistical Data and the Manner of Reporting on Events and Status in the Area of Public Security. Special records are kept manually, containing data about detected international channels, quantities and types of confiscated drugs on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia, on the number of Macedonian nationals deprived of liberty in other countries on grounds of being involved in cases of  trafficking in drugs, on drug users, as well as about the types of abused drugs. The Republic of Macedonia is a member of the INTERPOL since 1993 and since 1999, it is a member of the SECI Regional Centre, being under the reporting obligation about more specific cases of seizure of drugs.  The Tables bellow contain data on the total number of registered crime offences of Unauthorised production and release in trade of narcotics, psychotropic substances and precursors , under Article 215 of the Criminal Code and the crime of Enabling use of narcotic drugs, psychotropic substances, under Article 216 of the Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia, about the perpetrators (table 1), about the types and quantities of the confiscated narcotic drugs (table 2), as well as the trends regarding drug users, according to police statistics (table 3).  

Table 1: Crimes and perpetrators CRIMES 2001 2002. 2003  Crimes under Article  215 of the Criminal Code: unauthorised production and release for trade of narcotics, psychotropic substances and precursors 
287 
216 
306  Crimes under Article 216 of the Criminal Code: enabling the use of narcotic drugs and psychotropic substances and precursors  
61 
66 100 PERPETRATORS  Crimes under Article 215 of the Criminal Code: unauthorised production and release for trade of narcotics, psychotropic substances and precursors  400 307 412  Crimes under Article 216 of the Criminal Code: enabling the use of narcotic drugs and psychotropic substances and precursors   70 71 105 Source: Ministry of the Interior  
Table 2: Types and quantities of confiscated narcotic drugs 
year Heroin Marihuana Hashish Cocaine Raw opium Ecstasy Acetic Anhydride 2001 110 kg and 882 g 99 kg and 115 g; 606 plants 122 g and 186 seeds  309 kg and 846 5 kg and 860 g 3 kg and 494 g 45 tablets 2002 28 kg and 572 g 29 kg  and 234 g ; 815 plants and 298 seeds 258 kg and 406 342 g 22 kg and 930 18.341 tablets 2003 66 kg and 145 g 180 kg and 681 g  858 plants and 217 g seeds 423 kg and 504 6 kg and  502 g 17 kg and 947 9.646 tablets 400 litres Source: Ministry of the Interior  
Table 3: Registered drug users Year 2001 2002 2003 Users  5.030 5.222 6.034 Source: Ministry of the Interior  
12. Have you concluded Memoranda of understanding with concerned counterparts (ports, express delivery services, etc.)? 
The cooperation with the public enterprises and companies that perform related activities (post offices, express mail service, the telephone providers etc.) is carried out in accordance with the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 15/95, 44/02 and 74/04). Pursuant to Article 142 of this Law, the Ministry of the Interior may request necessary information from legal entities and institutions having public authorities, in order to perform inspection in their documentation, or to conduct inspection of certain facilities and premises.  The Republic of Macedonia, so far, has not signed Memoranda of Understanding with relevant partners beyond civil administration, aimed at regulating joint and coordinated action on drug control.   
13. Do your authorities make use of systematic risk-analysis? To what extent do they rely on financial investigations and on controlled deliveries? 
In the course of its day-to-day activities, the Ministry of the Interior does not use a systematic risk-analysis, but there is a risk-analysis in respect of each indication, i.e. only indications which provide sufficient grounds for suspicion that a crime has been perpetrated are subject to separate risk analysis. Financial investigations at the Ministry of the Interior are conducted by the Financial Crime Sector, which in its scope of work gathers indications and data on the committed financial frauds for the purpose of acquiring illegal proceeds.  The Sector cooperates with the Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering. The Law on Prevention of Money Laundering and other Criminal Proceeds (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 46/2004) prescribes the obligation for entities that deal with financial transactions, for transactions exceeding 15,000 EUR, to establish the identity of the entity-party to the transaction, as well as related transactions in the amount exceeding 15,000 EUR. Financial investigations related to illicit drug trafficking are only an indication that a certain individual or organisation have gained or are gaining drug trafficking proceeds. After the adoption of the amendments to the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 74/04), controlled delivery and transportation of persons and objects were introduced as a special investigative measure in the Republic of Macedonia. In its work thus far, the Ministry of the Interior has had certain experiences in undertaking and execution of controlled deliveries of narcotic drugs, and has achieved satisfactory results, i.e. it has seized larger amounts of drugs, while a number of persons have been arrested. Through its competent organisational units, the Ministry of the Interior continually cooperates and exchanges information with the police authorities of the European countries and wider, and takes part in police operations led by INTERPOL and SECI (Southeast European Cooperation Initiative). These police operations require application of controlled deliveries as a special investigative measure.  
14. Is the EU Action Plan on Drugs 2000-2004 known? 
The Inter-Ministerial State Commission for Combating Illicit Production, Trade and Abuse of Drugs, as well as other competent drug control institutions and agencies of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia are familiar with the EU Action Plan on Drugs 2000-2004. The Inter-Ministerial State Commission for Combating Illicit Production, Trade and Abuse of Drugs has distributed the EU Action Plan on Drugs in 2003, along with the preliminary Draft Action Plan for Fight against Drugs in the Republic of Macedonia, which is fully harmonised with the EU Action Plan on Drugs 2000-2004. In addition, this Commission according to the Government Action Plan for European Partnership, is to prepare a National Strategy for Drug Control by June 2005, which would be harmonised with the EU Action Plan on Drugs 2005-2009. The ongoing activities for drug control in the Republic of Macedonia are based on the principles set forth in the EU Action Plan on Drugs 2000-2004. 
15. Does a "National Programme for the fight against drugs" exist? How is it implemented? 
The Government of the Republic of Macedonia, aiming to intensify and coordinate the activities of the competent Ministries in the area of drug control, in 1996 adopted the National Programme for Suppression of Drug Abuse and Illicit Drug Trafficking (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 35/96). In accordance with this Programme the Governement of the Republic of Macedonia in 1998 set up the Inter-ministerial State Commission for Combating Illicit Production, Trade and Abuse of Drugs which perepares the Programme for control of illicit production and trade with narcotic drugs psychotropic substances and precursors, and for prevention of drug abuse and submits it to the Governement of the Republic of Macedonia. The Programe for control of illicit production and trade in narcotic drugs, psychotropic substances, and precursors and for prevention of drug abuse defines the activities of the competent ministries an agencies responsible for implementation of the activities directed towards drug supply and drug demand reduction. It also foresees activities for approximation of the national drug legislation with the European Unions acquis on Drugs, training activities of law enforcement personnel as well as activities in the area of primary, secondary and tertiary prevention of drug abuse. The Programme for control of the production and trade in drugs, psychotropic substances, and precursors and for prevention of the abuse of drugs, psychotropic substances and precursors is comprised of three principal chapters:   Activities for reduction of supply of drugs, psychotropic substances and precursors;   Activities to reduce the demand for drugs, psychotropic substances and precursors;   Inter-ministerial coordination and cooperation. This Programme clearly defines the national priorities related to drug control and defines the role of the relevant ministries and agencies of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia. The Programme of the Inter-ministerial State Commission for Combating Illicit Production, Trade and Abuse of Drugs defines seven specific areas of action: activities in the field of law enforcement, activities or early detection, treatment and rehabilitation of drug users, activities of social reintegration of drug users, activities in the filed of education, activities aimed at youth, informative activities and international cooperation 
16. Although the acquis does not specify any administrative structures, how do you intend to prepare for participation in EMCDDA and the European Information Network on Drugs and Drug Addiction (REITOX)? Do you intend to set up a national focal point? 
There is no unified information network and system for collection, processing and publication of data on drugs and drug use in the Republic of Macedonia. Data on persons treated for health problems caused by use of drugs are registered on Hospital-Statistical Sheet form, which is sent to the National Public Health Institute. The data of hospital statistics on persons with health problems caused by drugs use are not processed. The Ministry of the Interior keeps a register of persons that have perpetrated crimes of  drug possession, as well as crimes of offering and enabling drug use, while the State Statistical Office collects data on persons convicted for drug related crimes. The Republic of Macedonia was included in the Project on Drug Information Systems and Networking-DIS, under the PHARE Multi-Beneficiary Programme for Fight against Drugs (1997-1999). A National Focal Point was established in 1999, and a donation from the PHARE program helped in realisation of the initial Focal Point staff training. Furthermore, the necessary logistics was provided for functioning of the Focal Point and National Reports were prepared in 1999 and 2000, and forwarded to EMCDDA. However, due to lack of finances, this project ceased to function within a year. It is important to emphasise that according to the Action Plan for European Partnership, the Macedonian Government plans to institutionalise the National Focal Point. Furthermore, in order to provide for the appropriate functioning of the National Focal Point, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia will undertake activities for creation of a drug information system according to the standards of the European Monitoring Centre for Drugs and Drug Addiction (EMCDDA). In this direction, the Republic of Macedonia plans to become part of the European Information Network on Drugs and Drug Addiction (REITOX). 
